France supports the proposal 
committee's meeting at Parliament House on Friday, Chairman of the Committee in which was the leadership of Mushahid Hussain Sayed don't been suggested that the relief goods, as well as representatives of all political parties sent a parliamentary delegation of Palestine. 
While talking to representatives of the media after the meeting, Mushahid Hussain Syed said that the committee has given to the France welcomed the proposal in which it has been said that Israel should take war immediately, as well as the relief work for the people affected in Gaza's allowed. 
He from Israel's attack on a crime against the humanity, said that all countries should condemned these attacks 
Mushahid Hussain double standards in the countries of the world to make the target of criticism against the terrorism, said that the people of Israel, but they talk to are silent on the attacks on the Palestinians. 
Foreign Affairs, Chairman of the Senate Standing Committee on the on leaders of grace frosty also made the target of criticism. 
He said that the committee has expressed his optimistic that Barak, the newly elected President of the United States during the first 100 days of his government with the Muslim Ummah will address so the Gulf created between the United States and the Muslim Ummah to be eliminated. 
Mushahid Hussain Syed said that the Muslim Ummah to fill the vacuum created between the West and not only emergency measures to be taken but be easier to solve problems like Kashmir and Palestine. 
Minister of State for Foreign Affairs country Khan told the committee that the foreign ministers of the Organization of Islamic countries are Saudi Arabia to participate in the meeting. 
This emergency meeting on with Israel has been called in the wake of the attacks. He said that Palestine is aware of in this regard and the government is in contact with leaders of other countries. 
Minister of State for Foreign Affairs said that the grace of Palestine should be resolved according to the resolutions of the United Nations. 
Arab countries belonging to the two journalists, who also attended the meeting and he has said about the present situation of Palestine in the meeting. 
Meanwhile, Islamabad international university students in a protest demonstration against the Israeli attacks on Palestine. 
The demonstrators were banners and TMD on which slogans against Israel. 
From the flu to refrain from 
American Scientists after the tests made on the research have come to the fore. 
Experiences proved that the less food to focusing on the flu virus in comparatively capability to deal with the reduced. 
Research has proved wrong The old adage that it is proved to be better to starvation in 'fever'. 
According to scientists, fever so during the eat 
Investigation of State University who has said that cars in found very few capability TO fight Infection AND WAS also likely to Die OF them While Taking The Normal FOOD MORE Resistance Against the Flu VIRUS IN Power. 
Professor Elizabeth According to the flu not only to the people who will be affected but very soon in the them also will take more time. 
She also said that the people of the flu vaccine have been taking them to the winter also should to refrain from during the few months. 
'first nuclear experiment in 1990 was' 
Thomas red Unilever National Laboratory of the United States in designer, are already working on the book of Los National Laboratory former director of the technical written with the cooperation of 
This book 'nuclear express: political history and the expansion of bomb' has been written, and the two writers have also claimed that the country has made nuclear bomb is he or any other country's nuclear secrets to or that of any other nuclear power cooperation is achieved. 
Thomas Reid said in a news interview that in 1990 in the era of Benazir Bhutto China had the experience of Pakistan's first nuclear bomb. 
Thomas red said that on the basis of many reasons he was sure that China had the experience of Pakistan's first nuclear bomb. 
reasons in the bomb design and the China scientists mentioned During the conversation with Information. 
He further said that this was the reason that only two weeks in Pakistan in 1998 and within three days in response to India's nuclear experience to nuclear experiment was able to. 
Thomas red reminded that in 61 in Russia has suddenly nuclear experience and was in response to the United States were to experience began 17 days in despite the fact that the United States had the bomb from a long period. 
He further said that the nuclear bomb in 1998 that Pakistan may experience of what was he was made from very carefully and confidence was to meet on the Pakistani scientists. 
Thomas was red when this question that China has provided the nuclear technology to Pakistan, In response, He said as China and India was joint enemy of Pakistan. 
He said that it is also present proof of that Dr. Abdul Qadeer Khan after the Chinese design. apart from this, The obtained documents in Libya were is also confirmed it from them. 
To another question whether the joint nuclear tests is common, He said in in the US Open in the desert of servants for Britain's nuclear experiment. 
He said that we are guesses also believed that Israel should also provide access to the results of the this experience. 
Thomas Reid and this question was also is China's program of nuclear proliferation. 
On this Thomas Reid said that in 1991 to set up in China city of Iran nuclear installation instructions for the raw material, and is provided. 
Besides this, China has provided of enrichment plant in Iran also. 
He said that China, North Korea, Iran, Syria, Pakistan, through Egypt, Libya and Yemen is to provide nuclear technology. 
Sun 2008 for the best 
The show to 'hard was put together by scoring the basis and the Ukraine in this family or nomadic band and a couple of songs with Justin also was included. 
This in an old car was also on the stage. 
2002 a profit of eight with regards to the second most successful show in which was Wembeldon million get sixty million dollars. 
Canadian show tour of the 24 countries, while were only 17 countries in which of them was the first international visit in the past eight years. 
Show of both the singers were King, conquerors, director of the girl' 'refunds of arrangements of the Union' visit also. 
have set up six in 2002 by his broken the record. 
Six in 2002 He In million earned 37 million dollars. 
bone to undertake the third as the most successful singer which earned 17 46 million dollars. 
Bruce earn 16 46 million dollars and the fourth and fifth position on police and his six million dollars. in part 12 million 
According to the magazine in 2002 eight very few people in North America to participate in the programs of the concert and songs and only those people, who participated in were ready to buy the tickets at high prices. 
Average in the United States an eight percent increase in the price of tickets and most expensive in the show three hundred fifty tickets will was sold. 
magazine editor of Gary said that in the context of the World Economic marketing singers for eight proved to be a good year 2002. 
He 2003 for reconstruction to UK and issued this year of which are the good year proved the forecast predicting. 
Ban on education: Taliban mixed 
Miran Shah, North Waziristan President position and other districts in the local Taliban has a Hafiz Gul Bahadur group, which is distributed in educational institutions on official and semi threat which has been given to boys and girls in education is being given mixed. 
hindrance in the pamphlet that if five educational institutions have not closed mixed by January, started action will be taken against them. 
hindrance in the pamphlet is that government aid and other Educational Issues identity cards of women for the ban on film will be the offices and women in all districts NADRA has refused to go. 
Local women by the Taliban on a film identity cards of the ban has been announced at a time when the Support program in North Waziristan NADRA for identity cards in the offices of two hundred women have deposited form for the film. 
According to local people, The pamphlet issued by the Taliban on all mosques of North Waziristan was read on 
However it has not been mentioned in the letter that separate the girls educational institutions will also be ban on or not. 
According to the announcement, after making the identity cards to get education or for any woman school or NADRA in case of arresting the office, and his family to the legitimate this woman will be punished. 
Besides this, in Bannu district police said on Sunday that Mrannshah Banu is of a land mine explosion took place on a road, in which a man was killed and one injured. 
Injured admitted to Civil Hospital in Bannu. 
'targeted killings', More bodies found 
According to the police, The president position on Sunday morning and green areas of Mingora 'Khan area found the bodies of two people from the head of which are separated from their backs. 
Of those killed belonged to the Frontier Corps and police is being told. 
Eyewitnesses say that also received a letter from near the bodies which were warned in his bodies to that which the day he first raised at 11 your will be responsible of killing himself. 
Local people say that till 11 bodies lying in the market. However, after security officials both dead bodies in the temporary transfer. 
President position near Mingora and target killings during the last few weeks in the areas of dangerous see increased to a great extent in incidents of 
alleges in which civilians including women and security officials have been killed. 
Till now According to local sources, this type of incidents in more than 30 people have been killed. 
So far no organization has claimed the responsibility of these killings. 
On Saturday the local Taliban spokesman in Swat Muslim Khan told the BBC Friday that have received the bodies of three dead bodies in his companions were also in which Taliban commander of Rafi Ullah was also included the body. 
Muslim Khan said that Rafi Ullah last month and a half, the security forces were in custody. 
To someone he had said that when the local Taliban killed, first issued a notice to civilians on the other hand these incidents in Mingora in severe concern is found. 
Local people say that large number of security forces in Mingora is deployed, but he is increasing attacks on the citizens. 
Benazir tribute in the singing of 
was recorded in the voice of a rape Lance (modern) a style of music is now us was also post on the Tube. 
Five minutes on this photographs and video of Benazir Bhutto have been given. 
Eighteen years Edinburgh University student. 
Their poetry and singing from deep love. 
Being said that he has apparently after his mother's encourage fond were started singing. 
presented a tribute to his mother, He said that 'you were intelligent and beautiful,' you every work in a manner. 
December 27, He said about the incident is that you have been shot near the temple to, we were separate from in the age of flour, three children leave to bereaved. 
Without the entire nation, hope and you all of them are present in heart. 
Benazir Bhutto, after 20 years Bhutto in other children are on the list. 
He started in music earns interest. 
Being that he has his mother in America, before the return of a journalist friend award developed through the music producer and rapper daddy had expressed his desire to meet the meeting. but it could not. 
Sindhi newspapers also published some of the poetry but his voice was published for the first time through the Tube being heard. UC 
Benazir Bhutto some of needy workers and paid the rape Lance CDs of the started. 
Pakistan People's Party spokesman Farhatullah Babar other side has confirmed that the US present on the Tube's poetry, and 
On the phone from Islamabad, He said that this is a daughter of depress paid tribute to his mother courage beneficial is that the official Pakistan TV network was still going on. 
Farhatullah Babar has said that the CDs of the others to distribute program of his party has not at present. 
They had said that the fee of a few months ago young chairman on his party's web site Bhutto and Zardari was made of fake account or who has been ended after. 
Ajmal Butcher is Only Pakistani Information MInister: 
federal minister for Information AND Broadcasting, Sherry RAHMAN WERE Sent To THE BBC Urdu service in a S. M. S. Message Ajmal confirmed the Citizenship OF the Butcher, JUST SO SAID that Further Investigations are still going on. 
Prior to this, the prime minister's advisor interior Rahman denied the country from the Pakistani citizenship. 
They had said that the citizens of the record from institutions NADRA Ajmal had no record of them. 
This latest announcement, did not know about that the government of Pakistan has now changed its stand on what basis while Ajmal Butcher has confirmed the citizenship. 
However, According to a spokesman of the foreign ministry Ajmal butcher of the citizenship of the interior ministry confirmed. 
Prior to this, The BBC Urdu service and a few other newspapers and TV channels, Ajmal belonged to butcher from Kot town Okara district of Punjab province Farid said. 
But was refused by the government. 
Yet it is not clear that it is concerned with this Fareed Kot of Ajmal or any other area. 
Rocket fire from Lebanon, counter bombing 
Israeli police and army officials said the media representatives that Lebanese four rockets were fired on Israeli soil from the area from which one north Israel town of fell in which two people suffered minor injuries. 
Lebanon in response to the rocket launchers from the area of the Israeli tanks bombardment on Lebanon. The 
It is not clear that this attack Hezbollah have or the hand of active Palestinian groups in Lebanon is behind. 
Lebanese Government has said that he also was trying to find out about it is that he who is behind the rocket attacks. 
The correspondent of BBC has to the current crisis in the region is a very dangerous turn. 
BBC editor for Middle East According to from rocket attacks to spread the war has increased threat. 
In the past few days It was being expressed apprehension that the operation in Gaza anywhere in north of Israel's border with Lebanon not to be spread. 
The night between Wednesday and Thursday, Israel's air 60 air attack on the Gaza Strip. 
According to the Israeli army, The police, the offices of the Hamas in these attacks tunnels, weapons effects, rocket fire to the closed places and weapons of Hamas activists were targeted. 
Besides the air attacks from the shrapnel of Israeli army and navy also continued throughout the night bombardment on Gaza. 
Palestinian sources said that the air attacks in a mosque in Gaza City were damaged. 
According to unconfirmed reports, Israeli army tanks, which had help from helicopters air is the step forward towards the area of Khan Yunis. 
In this fight for the last 12 days in which seven hundred Palestinian included a large number of women and children, were killed. 
While the other hand, the Israel army 11 soldiers were also killed. 
Israel's security forces have confirmed that a high of it most defense officials the terms of the ceasefire Cairo are going to decide. 
parallel with the ambassadors of Egypt, also A Hamas delegation is going to Cairo for talks. 
Besides this, The leader of the Palestinian Authority Mahmoud Abbas are also arrived in Cairo on Friday. 
My heart is broken, "back my kidney 
Dr. Richard eight years ago, said that he has to save the lives of his wife his kidney as donation. 
According to the AFP news agency has said that his wife of Dr. donated their kidneys, the reward of them that the change of tactics and relations with any other guidelines for the divorce and now for the approach. 
Dr. an interview with a local newspaper Daily News, said that the alleged the hole in my heart, which is so far. 
According to Dr. Richard باٹسٹا's lawyer, though, Dr. are demanding the return of their round but in fact they want equal subsidies worth of newcomers. 
According to his wife, they can stand in the next few days will appear before a judge. 
140 years, nine 5-6 kilo free 
'George The joint for two weeks ago was caught with a sea. 
The city of sea food company had purchased it in 100 dollars. 
And immediately to the Pictures has started to use for their publicity. 
However to a group who work for the Protection of Animals, beaten, also demanded to leave the in which now it will be left to return in the sea. 
George was arrested by sea in Canada which city crepe and, after the food company spent 10 days in the tank. 
The weight of the fact of the age of can be. 
The restaurant manager has said that he does not intend to send any harm to the in the tank and was aimed at having to provide goods of the interest of consumers. 
organization belonging to the beaten the Protection of Animals praised has said that the decision of restaurants and they have is an example for the people who want to keep such rare animals or in Tank, or have them alive heat want food. 
With the help of mobile search of child 
When officials known in about of city police officer and extinguish the forces came into play. 
The child, officials with the help of mobile GP in S. know its place right set. 
However, with the help of street interview came to know that the girl is in a hotel. 
A week ago of grandmother on نٹالی's legal parents were carried out with the supervision of. 
The police chief of told the BBC, He said that the enemy will never back now and then he left the state. 
Police have set up contact Ms. But according to the promise when he if police did not back through the mobile phone of the decided to search It. 
Two thousand five or law is that the mobile service in the United States to provide the companies of 100 meters distance of the 67 percent and three hundred meters distance the 95 percent of to provide. 
Hamid Karzai on a tour of India 
Hamid Karzai Indian visit is the second in five months. 
There is a hope that he met with Prime Minister Manmohan during the, after the terrorist attacks in Mumbai will hold talks about the situation. 
During this visit the Mumbai attacks on Afghanistan and its people's sentiments expressed their solidarity with India and wants to. 
During this visit of Karzai that extremism will be discussed on the mutual trade. 
intensity and mutual cooperation between the two countries to deal with the talks on hope. 
President Hamid Karzai during his last tour of India, said that terrorism had to India and Afghanistan will not be given the obstacles between the relations. 
They It was also said that terrorism and merciless to both India and Afghanistan and is facing a challenge of assassination operations. 
Both countries and the whole region airlifting all is beneficial for peace and stability. 
'we know ownership is that both countries and the entire world is united can become the face of the menace of terrorism. 
It should be noted that in July last year for the attack on the US embassy in Kabul Karzai secret agencies of Pakistan, the ISI was responsible for Nepalese. 
This attack was a high in Indian were killed including four S. IMF officials. 
After the attack on the embassy of Karzai during the visit of Indian Prime Minister Manmohan Singh had said that was attacked on the friendship, India and Afghanistan, we agree with the fact that we have to terrorism would not mediate between their relations. 
Mumbai attacks, listening for the special judge 
Mumbai police commissioner Hassan Ghafoor told is that the extremists on Mumbai attacks were arrested only accused Ajmal Amir alive during the hearing of the case filed against the butcher, and will be under the supervision of 
Before this, in this matter government has formally appointed lawyer. 
Ajmal Butcher are currently in custody of the police and there is a hope that police before January 24 will admitted the charge sheet against them. 
Ajmal Butcher's have no lawyer to defend himself. 
Pakistan Government in a letter written to the butcher of legal appeal for help. 
India, Pakistan to join the Pakistani extremists in Mumbai attacks delegated the evidence. 
Pakistan has accepted that Ajmal Butcher Pakistani citizens. 
According to police the case Ajmal and his companion Abu Ismail A. T. S. chief winter additional police commissioner Ashok expert of police inspector Vijay to have killed six police officers, including ran away after his car snatched the who was in D B after passage was arrested by the Chopati. 
Ismail Khan's death in police action was located and police Ajmal was arrested alive. 
Ajmal represented the case yet for the any lawyer has not been nominated. 
Government Legal Aid cell, which begin Danish lawyer on moral grounds, He was nominated to had refused to take the case. 
Two lawyers of a political party, the demonstrations and the people after the opposition withdrew his name. 
Constitutional amendment: 'committee will be formed. 
about the environmental changes in Islamabad on Tuesday after addressing a Scheuer while talking to representatives of the media, parliamentary party in this connection, He said that the meeting would be called in which will be the formation of this committee. 
He said that so far the United National Movement to for the end of the 17th amendment constitutional amendment bill was presented to the national assembly and other political parties also in this regard will present a constitutional amendment bill in the parliament. 
He said that the end of the 17th amendment for the Pakistan People's Party also has also sent a draft to all political parties and this committee will examine the draft constitution. 
In response to a question, He said that the balance of power between the president and prime minister will decided to parliament. 
The prime minister said that the Parliament has all the right to independent decisions. 
In response to another question, He said that the Retired former President General Pervez Musharraf to leave the post of army chief apart from the role of political parties, the chairperson of the Pakistan People's Party and former Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto who is also important role of the international community, emphasizing that the former president Pervez Musharraf stressed on uniforms for the 
He said that American elected vice president who Pakistan and supporters of democracy, and their services in Pakistan has accepted President honor of Pakistan. 
Mumbai after the incident, on behalf of the Indian government to severing all kinds of relations with Pakistan in response to a question about the threat of Yousaf Raza Gilani said that Indian leaders to people at this time due to the heavy pressure of which he gave such statements. 
Journalists protest against the dismissal of 
Islamabad on Tuesday of journalists' r U an Islamabad under the auspices of the BJP, journalists and media workers in front of the Press Club The TV channels and newspapers employees from a large number of owners of the media and the government on the protest and chanted slogans. 
While addressing the demonstrators biggest Organization of journalists Pakistan Federal Union of Journalists, senior member, R. Shamsi said that till yesterday the jurist with our politics of protest over Today. he became the ruling, But the newspaper owners sitting in the house of a certain holding due to fear of the rights of journalists are not for some 
He said that talk of human rights to the newspaper owners to their institutions and the persecution of little kept up where billions of rupees despite earning workers as extremely low charges and The sacked their economic is being killed. 
The example of Lahore, a private TV channel Five activists of which has since four months before us today was a suicide at not receiving salaries and many workers also forced and months of tension due to lack of life are spending. 
He said that TV and newspaper owners initiative should be directly against the rights of journalists and a permanent protest camps in front of parliament for making the need. 
R. Punjab Governor Salman, the solar energy to make, said that the target of criticism of his Urdu newspapers' today 'tomorrow without any notice to employees of what is being taken. 
While daily Jinnah, Daily News, Plus TV Channel Five, business and TV today has also dismissed dozens of employees. 
P. F. J. Mazhar Abbas, secretary general of UK said while addressing the demonstrators that emotions in organizations all over the country today Black Day Against the of journalists and media workers are celebrating the achievements of their own rights and journalist in the parliament session for the stocks will be tied on black bandage. 
Mazhar Abbas according to Pakistan's newspapers and TV channels in 1985 percent being exploitation of activists and journalists are where they are working without any agreement. 
He said that till now more than 200 activists and journalists from newspapers and TV channels is being evicted while owners Is feared that the current year economic crisis as justification for further hundreds of workers will dismissed. 
Mazhar Abbas has said the movement will continue till when the journalists were dismissed employees to restore it, not to decide the wages of media workers of the seventh the enforcement of the wage board award, newspapers and TV channels has stopped since several months of employees, not the payment of salaries. 
11 member cabinet took oath 
Former Prime Minister Sardar Ateeq Ahmad Khan in new cabinet against the Muslim Conference six, two of Pakistan People's Party, The People's Muslim League Two includes a minister and the United National Movement. 
11 member and they are also a woman minister in the cabinet is related to Atiqur against Muslim Conference. 
In the ruling alliance has said that the cabinet will be extended next week and it is expected that another dozen will be included in the cabinet minister clarified that at the beginning of this month, Sardar Ateeq Khan's opponents by lack of confidence was removed from the post of Ministry of and was elected new Prime Minister Sardar Yaqub Khan. 
These departments of the ministers will be announced. 
Taking oath of office workers of the Pakistan People's Party on the occasion of shouted slogans in favor of former Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto. 
virus to 35 million consumers affected 
October 2001 The this virus identified for the first time in eight with names like down and up and is known. 
Microsoft issued a plot for dealing with the virus, but, Despite this, it was about 35 million computers and have been affected by this. 
Experts say that the affected are becoming the number of computers. 
consumers to deal with this' case of Microsoft associate zero zero resident 'need to use plot. 
Microsoft has said that the virus file to affect millions of computers' dot com email a search of S. E 'and this is included in the code. 
Have this after the virus de l PTCL in kind of file becomes. 
This virus file is also the name of creation, 
Then the registration of the punishes changed the details. 
This virus is to create a problem after the functional, The 'H of the TT Sarwar' come on the machine and punishes point to change. 
Then, it files download from the web site disliking. 
Microsoft has said that the virus has affected computers. in different countries of the world. 
These countries in China, Brazil, Russia, India, The United States and Britain. 
'INDIAN Information ON 
After a meeting in the Interior Ministry on Saturday while talking to representatives of the media, He said that the FROM INDIA 
From safeguards will help in investigation in this matter. 
He said that Pakistan is a sovereign country and India On the Information THEY Received FROM The investigation IN ANY of The Country 
We will not accept dictation. 
He Said that the Information Received FROM INDIA and other Information ARE ALSO 
Advisor said that law enforcing agencies, the interior, members of a banned organization, The fear to peace was taken into custody Under the glitch 
And if some of them is get any evidence against the people, action will be taken against him while innocent people to be released 
In response to a question, He said that the arrested person will not be handed over to India, According to the Pakistani laws against these people and the action will be taken. 
He said the action against those that the FIA is under the law. 
In response to a question, He said that the Indian law enforcing agencies in Mumbai incident involved people in 42 days in connection With the Information Therefore, The agreement is Optimistic that THE International Community Including INDIA On his Safeguards FOR THE investigation will GIVE SOME TIme TO Pakistan. 
He repeated again that this offer of the government Mumbai for the joint investigation of the accident team be formed. 
It should be noted that the leadership of the Additional director general of FIA is a member team was formed in that the Mumbai attacks from India 
On the Information Given TO Pakistan in connection with THE Investigation is. 
Shahid Malik, Pakistan's High Commissioner in India have met with President Asif Ali Zardari in which the president has made it clear that if any Pakistani individual or group was found involved in the Mumbai attacks, mostly against the action will be taken according to the laws of the country and one would not be handed over to India, while Indian leadership to the people involved in this incident to be handed over to India, about the constant pressure on Pakistan. 
'The United States is also possible in' 
Mr. 20 January to the United States will take oath as president. 
Washington 16th in the United States president Lankan after standing on the stairs of the building in the memory of the music while addressing a concert 
Mr. said by several generations of all is facing a serious and he hoped that the United States will successfully control on these problems. 
Lankan tradition of slavery in the United States to end. 
But with Mr. said that to resolve the problems faced by the country In path will take time and will be difficult. 
'but, Despite this, in the hope that this dream of the founders of the country will remain alive. 
Besides the United States of Afghanistan and Iraq wars, from a severe financial crisis is pouch. 
swearing the oath ceremony for the extra steps are being taken. 
Organizers is of the view that this will be 20 million people participated in the ceremony. 
Monday is a national holiday in the United States because the same day standard of human rights and deprived Martin Luther King was killed. 
Martin Luther King was black. 
paid tribute to Martin Luther, determination to work 
Kim To Dr. Martin Luther King, was killed in 1968. 
also paid tribute to the Dr. King and with the Americans said that this nation should work together to fulfill the promises. 
In Washington, The new president On Tuesday of people on the occasion of unique are being the preparations of the gathering. 
expected that the president has to see this historic chaired 20 million people will be collected in Washington. 
started the day on Monday North tour in a Medical Center in Washington, where he met with the American soldiers injured after the established for the houses they were in a sanctuary and a color on the wall. 
While talking to reporters said: "the present crisis that we are facing and themselves, in which a lot of people, we can not sit discharged after him. 
He said that Martin Luther King gave his spent more in the service of the people. 
said that 'When are we honor the memory of those, This is not the day so that we should stay and thoughts. This is such that we should. 
He said that Tuesday's ceremony will be on this path on which several thousand people of Martin Luther King 'is my one dream to hear the' Kim in 63 were collected. 
Martin Luther King had said in the speech that the day will come when the people of their color, not discriminate on will be unfairly. 
BBC's Matthew Price says T an irony of history that Martin Luther came 24 hours before the day when the first black president of American history is his will take the oath of office. 
For many people in the southern states of America under the chairmanship of Dr. Luther King's dream interpretation of Will. 
Additional agents intervene. 
Additional political agent to ten days before from South Waziristan kidnapped by unknown masked episode. 
Sources say that the official Mullah Nazir group of local Taliban was kidnapped. 
According to the local administration Tuesday evening near the south Waziristan at four additional political agent of Amir Latif to a Tribal Jirga Wana scouts camp. 
However, He has not said that additional political agent who was kidnapped. 
However, Local people say that political agent to Mullah Nazir group's local Taliban was kidnapped. 
Amir Latif was this time was kidnapped when he was being Wana. 
Two thousand January 9 to 11 in South Waziristan tribal area seven armed masked men additional political agent Amir Latif and driver kidnapped vowed. 
According to official kidnapped fighters to guard in the first vehicle was unarmed, and after the additional political agent to sit in a car and were taken from there. 
According to the local administration after additional political agent of kidnapping South Waziristan, security forces and all the check posts in the tribal areas semi was beefed up and people coming and going of hard, and was being checked on Wana, the last one week, The officials economic ban was imposed. 
8 December 2002 up to North Waziristan political agent "God was also was kidnapped at this time when it Bannu to celebrate Eid holidays were going after few days. and the two people including Tehsildar Amanullah Khan in North Waziristan was killed by unknown masked. 
British won in the court of the 
forty year old British citizen has admitted that he had U.S. military web site. 
Gary Asperger are patient. it clarified that the Asperger سنڈروم's patient, like the one is madness to work. 
His lawyers said that if he was handed over to the United States, fear that he will try to suicide. 
However, government lawyers said that Gary regarding the health of apprehensions are very limited. 
Lord Justice stages and Simon tells the decision, and said that it is allowed to stricter in British Court of review can request. 
Gary's lawyers asked the court to position that was adopted in Gary, if his home and away from the family, they can commit suicide. 
He added that at the home secretary did not consider. 
But government lawyers say that the home secretary were using their powers. 
Gary never American military web site is not to denies the. 
Gary and two in 2001 American computer system which was due to the American Government was a loss of 8 million dollars. 
Gary American marines and 97 including the computer system. 
But Gary has said that he has no intentions to wrong. but he WAS looking for Information ABOUT THE Heavenly Creatures WHO they think the U.S. Government WAS kept secret. 
Gary's mother Council Sharp said that he is happy with the decision. 
Gary's lawyer has said 'this is the right decision. 
This case is continuing since 2002 and eventually has a right decision. 
Kashmir: Two Hezbollah commander killed 
Jammu in the Indian army's northern command spokesman Lieutenant Colonel appointed told the BBC: "24 rifles Jammu and Kashmir police force had Confirmed Information ON Gandwah District OF Doda District IN Haus AT JUNGLE HAS Surrounded THE PLACE WHERE ARMED Extremists WERE Sitting 
He fired at the army and counter two armed extremists were killed in action. 
spokesman said that two militants were killed in active in 12 years, district and prohibited Uddin extraordinarily district commander of Hizbul Mujahideen, who was expert in land mine blast. 
Sajjad identified with it, has been the last year, according to the army, was linked with the extremists. 
According to this operation still continues in rural areas because according to him, There are more extremists army has said that the possibility of the presence of two Kalashnikov in the first phase of Operation, were also recovered. 
Yesterday, The police chief of the province Kumar The year 2000 eight figures, While issuing this year so far, the most peaceful year of. 
worth mentioning is that in November and December in the assembly elections in seven stages of There was no violence. 
Thirteen more than hundred fifty in these elections took part. 
It should be noted that last 18 years Hizbul Mujahideen is active in Jammu and Kashmir. 
The first time Hezbollah has unilaterally in July 2000 which was announced after the government talks between India and the commanders. 
However only 15 days in the seas fire ended. 
Later number of Hizbul Mujahideen high commanders were killed in different 
Thursday to Pakistan's popular daily, The news, has lived in Kashmir under the auspices of the extremist groups that had written about troop mujahideen Hizbul Mujahideen and has decided to review policy on Kashmir. 
It should be noted that both organizations for the policy of the armed resistance, It was that the Kashmir issue can be resolved through. 
Dera Bugti on gas pipeline explosion 
According to police officials returned Monday from gas field to remain the 18 inches of Qatar pipeline has been me from the explosion. 
Sui This pipeline is direction of the plant. 
Meanwhile themselves on the banned organization Baloch who the Republican Army spokesman of the telephone a person named by organization claimed the responsibility for the attack. 
fourth in gas pipeline has been put up. 
In Dera Allah Yar on Friday A 18 inches of Qatar was destroyed the pipeline which of the repair work was continued till Sunday morning. 
In Quetta Sui Southern Gas Company general manager Siddiqui has said that the supply of gas from the pipeline will be made after noon. 
Quetta via the pipeline sibbi. 
Pilgrimage and Quetta in other areas gas from three days of snowfall is where a severe shortage of higher temperatures below the status is continuing, and fell down from stoves and heaters and other has been cool have been shelved. 
Besides the Dera Bugti in property market in the city in motorcycle explosion took place according to the police, but this has not been a sort of loss of lives in the explosion. 
Party administrator for the 
Party center of mujahideen about 25 km away from Lahore in the school. 
Hospital in this center, school and hostels of students are also included. 
Law Minister Punjab is routinely Rana Khan said that the deployment of the charge in the centre of the party so that there has been brought in for welfare agencies work not be affected. 
Party According to the Khalid Waleed Hafiz Saeed, Emir of the Center located in hospitals, schools and other welfare organizations to supervise the emperor Babar, a chief government official has been appointed administrator while, according to him, in a police Center has also increased. 
The United Nations Security Council has imposed the ban on party, which after Pakistan's federal government take action against the throughout the country and to other leaders, including party leader Hafiz Saeed detainee has been. the Punjab government center from the mujahideen in appointed by the federal government to party against the continuation of the operation. 
Emperor of Babar D M G district to Management Group. 
Hafiz Khalid Waleed said on Sunday that the commissioner in Lahore division Park Pervez Khan with police and civil administration Center come in different parts of the center and inspected. Khalid Waleed party on behalf of the government condemned the appointed administrator in the centre of the and has already said that due to the activities of the government Center located in patients in hospital and there has been a reduction in the number of children in school. 
Party, According to a press release of the party leader Hafiz Saeed, Secretary General of the United Nations committee honeymoon and race for the name of Taliban has written a letter in which the Security Council to them to end the ban imposed on the party has been asked to. 
It was said in the letter that the Security Council to party decided unilaterally to ban on injustice and party has no connection with terrorism of but it is engaged in welfare work. 
On relief mission of the Edhi Gaza 
In Gaza entered the need for many stages to get permission to he now after the passage of New York have succeeded in reaching Egypt. 
While talking with the BBC Urdu service from Cairo, He said that he still could not reach Gaza because Egypt and Israel has a lot of obstacles standing. 
He said, "I came here eight days have been and still not allowed to leave Gaza. 
'in this time and I hope that tomorrow in Cairo will be allowed to leave Gaza. 
Giving details, He said: "I first to Gaza after was given visa for only seven days and in my insistence on the Pakistani officials to help me and prevailed, but on condition of a month, will go only once in Gaza that single arriving. 
He said that with her son and daughters are and they want to work in Gaza. 
'I get some money. 
Egypt one million dollars to the Red Cross of check and ten thousand dollars cash so that they are given also sending relief goods into Gaza. 
Four more ministers in the cabinet, 63 tomorrow 
Two United National Movement in four new federal ministers and two members of the Jamiat Islam Fazlur Rehman Group E are included. 
President Asif Ali Zardari, administered the oath to the new ministers. 
Oath swearing in ceremony of Prime Minister Yousaf Raza Gilani, the members of the federal cabinet also present 
Four new ministers of inclusion in the federal cabinet secretaries and Federal Minister, minister of state with universal number of 63. 
MQM Farooq Sattar and the two ministers Babar Ghauri and Jamiat Islam scholars prime Swati and Maulana Fazlur Rehman group included Ataur Rahman. 
Yet these ministers departments has not been announced. 
Farooq Sattar, while the convener of the MQM Babar Ghauri MQM period of Senator and they are being ended on March 10. 
Prime Swati as Azad, and he was elected senator in a considered among the richest Senator. 
Maulana Ataur Rahman, a member of the National Assembly and Maulana Fazlur Rehman, the younger brother. 
Remember that occupy four secretaries on important posts are not members of the National Assembly. 
clarified that three two thousand eight cabinet in November 22 18 new ministers and ministers of state were included, was being believed at the time the MQM in that the cabinet members will also be included However because of differences in the distribution of ministries MQM was not included. 
Baluchistan, blew the pipeline 
According to the police, this 18 inches of Qatar pipeline which is different Hill Monday in the Sui gas plant on and this is unknown people blew up early in the morning. 
Besides the well number three in Sui yesterday to completely destroyed by the explosion, and the near Dera Allah Yar, a gas pipeline was damaged in the explosion. 
Responsibility of these explosions Baloch Republican Army spokesman banned organization has accepted by his organization. 
Two thousand years in Baluchistan reconstruction started in the incidents of violence has increased. 
So far this month to dozens of gas pipe lines me with the explosions while railway trains and belonging to the Punjab province was the increase in attacks on people. 
Balochistan Chief Minister Nawab Aslam Although these incidents have expressed concern over and exchange Of Information WITH The police Intelligence Agencies orders have been Issued so far But STOP OF These Incidents COULD Not be possible. 
economic package of rehabilitation of 819 billion dollars approved 
The plan of President belonging to any party in favor of any member who did not vote. 
members had said that this very expensive 'economic plan' will and will not be effective. 
This package in the House of Representatives in favor of two hundred and forty one hundred in 1988 while opposition votes were cast. 
economic rehabilitation of this plan should be presented in the Senate next week is where Hezbollah is extraordinary majority Democratic Party to power. 
Is being expressed apprehension that due to the severe opposition from the party The approval from the Senate will not be easy. 
Economic restoration in the House of Representatives approved the plan after the stressed on the members, said that political differences should not allow obstacles in the way of this important project. 
President said that this project in which he expressed the hope that the law until next month will take shape in the country will be helpful in a legislative environment in which could promote trade in American will. 
Under this plan, ordinary men and business community of 200 75 billion dollars for the disengagement and five hundred and forty billion in loans renovated ten thousand schools, roads, bridges, and unemployment will be given for the research of new 
BBC correspondent Richard Lister in Washington has said that while throwing the political differences behind degraded to a new political culture character but it was determined to hold discussion on economic package has once again created bitterness in political basis. 
party in the House of Representatives members of the government to bill proposed by the government as a waste of money and said that the new employment will get no help to create 
He has stressed his party on the bill proposed by the in which more attention has been given the rebate. 
He said his much less through the package of employment in the investment can create more 
He said that the construction of the project in taxes contents out immediately, employment, More than can created 
Israeli President, prime minister in bitterness 
Rajab Tayyeb The Israeli president said while crying that has been Spilt blood of human beings in Gaza and was sorry to see him that the people by the Israeli military on the reason of clapping can also rang. 
Mr. said: "I think that you are perhaps their guilt for correcting such words are used and he also high voice but you have killed people and I am remembering those children who was killed near the beach. 
Perez said that the Gaza tragedy, not Israel, Hamas, which has committed dangerous dictator championship established there. 
from A BBC correspondent says that the World Economic Forum in this first ever I did not watch the scene. 
However after the has said that while he respects to the president of his age and are also due to which they not yell at them but whatever she was saying he was miles away from the truth. 
Turkey these sugarcane grams to in Muslim countries which have diplomatic relations with Israel but the last few years of tension in is found. 
not in Pakistan attack plan 
Indian TV channel 'N. while talking to Wajid Shamsul Hasan said that the Mumbai attacks Pakistani investigation report will be issued soon. 
Last November in the Mumbai attacks In one hundred more than 70 people were killed. 
India says that responsibility for the attacks of extremist organization Mujahideen is on. 
Mumbai, India has also said that Pakistan 'state of elements, were involved in the attacks. 
following the Mumbai attacks have been affected relations between the two countries. 
High Wajid Shamsul Hasan Pakistani investigation related to the first statement is that this was an indication that the investigation is in a report. 
Wajid Shamsul Hasan said: "as far as investigations have reached on his car, has not been used soil of Pakistan. 
No place and this can not, Britain. 
These two places were (Britain) and Pakistan which I was concerned about. 
Mumbai, India and the international community for action against the responsible of the attacks has made enough pressure on Pakistan. Pakistan has said that the alleged groups involved in the Mumbai attacks in action against dozens of people taken into custody. 
Wajid Shamsul Hasan said: "we are not trying to disguise it. 
We believe in action on facts. 
Our investigation approved the world. 
We (to) results of the investigation will try to satisfy India. 
He made in the investigation of delay while defending said that this type of explosives to collect and check the understanding, It takes time to experiment. 
High Wajid Shamsul Hasan said that India to submit their in 45 day started. 
Also leader of the black elected 
Sixth away of the Republican Party in elections in which Michael steal has won the victory with a votes, 1991 votes. 
In the party chairman steal opponent candidate in the elections for the post of the Dawson received 77 votes while former chairman Duncan were competition in the second stage. 
Is said to reporters that the Chairman of the Republican Party for the championship, which remained five candidate Michael steal them. Most are made to moderate leader. 
Michael steal said in his address after the win it with his friends and one of the opponents' we are saying that you come with us, but this gap in people who want launch for the away from it we will be ready. Michael steal is my land from where they had been deputy governor. 
Two thousand in six he got fame when he was standing in the election for a Senate seat. 
But in the Senate elections after losing the party a intervene were given Chairman of the Committee. 
Now after being elected party chairman of the party country wide campaign of Sir fundamentalism will be in these efforts. 
He choose on promises that the party will give a new agenda and lobbying for arose from the party supporters will use the new technical. 
In and the presence of Indian claim 
The play from the militants in the Present Information. 
Government network according to Intelligence Information on the army AND Police have surrounded the area and Started Searches. 
During the clash, was started in which four militants, two soldiers and a police officer was killed. 
According to the clashes were ongoing until it received LAST Information network in The area and AND associated with Militants who are Present for The army TO fight MORE MARINE Has been sent there. 
During this coalition government nominated by the chief minister Omar Abdullah and his meeting with the governor of the National Party conference by the leader of the assembly Formally Informed ABOUT THE Grams. 
ally of National Conference party congress has ALSO Informed OMAR Abdullah WITH The support of the governor. 
Omar Abdullah oath as chief minister of the state tomorrow will be given. 
Remember that recent national conference in state elections 387 members and 28 seats in the House of the biggest party emerged. it should be noted that separation parties had elections. 
Congress, which was to get 17 seats, national conference with the coalition government is ready to make. 
Today in Srinagar on arrival of the party Omar Abdullah's warm welcome with Joshi. 
On this occasion, Omar Abdullah said that talks between the government and the separatists India will play a role to make the possible holding of elections and the new government in India but it will not be possible to coming to power. 
The role of the European Union for peace in the Middle East 
Government with regard to the Middle East would be viewed the reconciliation efforts to stop the war role of the European Union in decisive. 
According to the official position, Berg delegation or سارکوزی's efforts in this work are the hands. 
The European Commission spokesman Amadeu Altafaj said that every effort is commendable joint message of war through which the European Union can help in getting to the parties. 
Government statement, to the extent there is all right. 
But in European Union interior Khana slowly struggle is a regrettable the picture. 
As president of the union has already weak role of the Czech Republic. 
To the internal fight over it is helpless. 
Other hand, The French president practice it as he is still responsibility to the presidency of the European Union are performing. 
Though France has been doing his presidential term of six months. 
want to play a role and he is also can, but he is not allowed to this. 
The most ridiculous situation facing French Foreign Minister Bernard Kouchner. 
It is included in the delegation led by the foreign minister of Czech Republic are Schwarzenberg. 
About the victimized on the Middle East war in both foreign ministers are different statements. 
Schwarzenberg say that Israel has right to defend themselves when Kouchnerکے near in the category of defense not seen this war. On the other hand, Germany has also kept their A special envoy sent to the Middle East. until we based on equal position, expressed The European Union does not, this can not be won on the diplomatic front 
proof of this is the practice of Israel makes no importance to Europe's reconciliation efforts. 
This time for the European Union is golden opportunity to do something because due to the policies of the United States George W. Bush has failed in the Middle East. 
Billionaires financial crisis: German industrialist conducted himself. 
In southern Germany resident of the area of the has left behind a big business group,. 
But for some time ago General German citizens were not know more about them. 
Again when they industrial group of 30 near the banks of the loans to have talks silent for several weeks with the subject of the headlines also became a group and was also looks dark future. 
group to German maker institutions the purchase of shares after the financial crisis due to the loss of several hundred million euros also had to bear. 
And financial institutions must this group needed, worth between 700 million and one billion euro, has refused to give new loans came under pressure. 
Some time ago that bank loans on emergency basis group were ready to provide, but from a small industrialist who had reached the point that their annual income of industrial group had become nearly 30 billion euros, their exclusion from power irresponsible investment could not tolerate. 
when after the death of his father took his family business while on the lines this development of very soon. 
He named Ratiopharm his company of which Germany today is very successful and very important drug manufacturing company. 
For some time before the drug business of the organization was worth between five and six billion euros, and it still is annual income of 1.8 billion euro. form after the great success of the group has many big organizations including construction equipment to prepare for purchasing the hydel cement to the types of vehicles to prepare the company is also named Kässbohrer. 
A number of employees in the whole world group million in assets and is near the named form drug manufacturers is always get the special importance to the company. 
had stated many times in his life: "we pharmacy, There have been four generations. 
Now have this organization of my children and I hope that this organization until a few hundred years of my family will remain in 
banks after the suicide of his group. VEM interim loans worth 400 million euros for the approval is given, But the condition is that VEM form to sell so the group's financial condition will be better be constructed on long term basis. 
It group after the death of also will not be who they never. 
The ratio of foreign people in crimes in Germany 
Under the latest statistics 2004 so the foreigners between 2007 22. the crime rate 
9 percent less to 21. 
She came to 4 percent. 
Minister province داخلہJoachim Herrmann According to this is only a formal positive change. 
He said: it must be kept in mind that German citizenship to get the number of foreigners who is increasing. 
So it should also be disclosed in a statistic is that although German citizen to committing the crime But the background of foreign. 
Herrmann has said that his province and figures about the criminals from 2010 collected while It will also keep in mind. 
Besides the province in is also being thought on the same lines. 
CDU belonging to the affairs of the interior senator Christoph Ahlhaus said: scientific way when one is of research in the results can not prepared their own but it depends on these statistics, The research has come after. 
Ahlhaus a provincial office of the narcotics crimes sampled drew attention towards the report which was prepared in 2006 and under the discovered in Bergdorf was part of the city was set up here that many attended percent of the foreigners in the crimes. 
Results from here I realized that the foreigners 
All the crime rate in the face of the crimes in the province. less 
This in Berlin during the 2006 in the contrary, when youths of crime rate was reviewed, it was revealed that the ratio of foreign youths to background 44. 
7 percent. 
However, Germany's other political parties as SPD nationalists party Greenberg, environment arm party of this proposal Linkspartei together and figures that concerned with crimes against this Information While ALSO Collected THE Background Of WHAT GERMAN Citizen, THAT Is Foreign. 
want early withdrawal of forces from Gaza: 
stressed the masses for complete withdrawal of forces of ceasefire permanent and lasting agreement is essential. 
Hamas and Israel announced a ceasefire The day Sunday. 
Islamic militant group Hamas, announced a ceasefire of Saturday said that within a week, The Israeli forces from Gaza Strip completely and cordoned the Gaza Strip should be out of place. 
leader of the other side has said that from Israel in the war on behalf of God is achieved a victory. 
He says that the war in Israel has been unable to achieve our goals. 
Prior to this, The Egyptian city of Sharm el-Sheikh on Sunday, A meeting of the leaders of the European and Arab countries which was held in from Israel was demanding an immediate withdrawal of forces. 
It was decided in the meeting that soon for the international aid conference will be held. 
After meeting German Chancellor in also participated. 
between Israel and Hamas The war continuing for three weeks at least 13 Palestinians and 13 Israeli tomorrow, including Ten soldiers, were killed. 
Other hand Palestinian president Abbas in the Palestinian areas, the United National Government has stressed on the importance of making. 
The name of Germany video message of al-Qaeda 
30 minutes in the video for the duration of one person, wearing black turban of color, mouth onto gun in German hands and is a message to the government. 
This man is introduced by the name of Abu Talha himself and is talking in German language. 
The Arabic all the video message are also present. 
screens on the of has started, and is the history of video in October 2008. 
In this message from the German Government said that such a large number of troops in Afghanistan has been appointed and the country is expressed his belief that this would not attack on it, and it is not ripe, it lost? 
The person has to tell the himself although not indirect threat of attacks on Germany. 
Nato allied forces in Afghanistan at this time the number of German soldiers in around three thousand. 
German parliament in October last year further send a thousand soldiers, Afghanistan has also passed the law. 
Germany to meet the THE is the first message. 
Scare The noted to keep an eye on relevant issues of terrorism Mikhail LÜDERS, with reference to this message says: recently in the German embassy in Kabul suicide attack outside the proof of this is that we take it seriously in any circumstances. 
Over the past few years video messages on internet is issued and there were messages after the attack. 
The German embassy in Kabul on Saturday, the responsibility of the suicide attack outside the Taliban military organization. 
Most German newspapers and observers to this attack are looking maneuvering to message. 
they are making Germany target. 
basis pious Muslims, Germany's Afghan policy on negative watch to see 
He not only on the German government to adopt a biased policy but also in Middle East Afghanistan accused their names. 
And it due to Germany to understand more than its target. 
Meanwhile, The German Government has said that the video could before coming to the German secret agencies to know about this. 
German Federal Crime Prevention organization is busy in check the video message. 
takes the post of US Presidency. 
In this context, the American people, on the one hand, the whole has been linked with the different expectations. 
And now becoming president of the United States have received messages of congratulations from all over the They are also are emerging relating to expectations. 
In this regard, The German chancellor have expressed confidence on the new US president. 
"I am sure that the Federal Republic of Germany and the United States on the basis of the deep friendship and partnership between we can solve problems facing. 
Russian Prime Minister Mir Putin has said that are seen, owner of a serious and open hearts and it is good as 
Thus, former US President George W. Bush's policies is to face criticism. 
However his administration to China to play a more constructive role on the international level to the movement of the US president is certainly appreciated while the new China, have said that they have about the strong military ties between the two countries will have to work for. 
German city Chinese expert active in politics says: 
"I believe in this context is that in the coming weeks and months great pressure and his economic team will cast and the Beijing government and a metal for the Chinese currency market as the exchange rate will be forced to adopt. 
Former US administration has made to further relations with India. 
where these relations can be, taking about the American sociology professor Christopher in New Delhi rule says: "now we close strategic partnership championship came at night, But the no one can not change law. 
Pope Also in the name of message of peace and cooperation in has stressed the need to promote environment. 
Provincial elections in Iraq 
After years 2005کے this war hit first are important elections in the country. 
440نشستوں in provincial elections for the 14,400سے in more than resting. 
During the elections to maintain the peace and order situation for the eight hundred thousand police and soldiers have been stationed in Iraq. 
view of this danger, that no explosion or any such important day and scare attack not be all the borders of Iraq on Friday, a day earlier were cell. 
Besides, closed the airport surveillance and were has been imposed a ban on public transport. 
According TO Information, due to a ban on Transport CAn't see the traffic on the roads and IRAQI Children ARE Looking Playing Football ON THE roads. 
One side with the security situation during the recent Iraqi elections, they will realize that the year 2011 after the withdrawal of the US forces from Iraq in local agencies The reigns of the country line will find control or not, On the other hand the autobiography, political analyst it as an experience with which are that the Iraqi people will be appointed to figure out how to bring change in the country through democratic means are willing to a great extent. 
With the help of the United Nations provincial elections are being held in Iraq and about eight hundred international observers are to supervise the electoral process. 
Today day throughout the day in Iran Hazrat Imam Hussein remember great respect and honor of the great sacrifice was celebrated 
Mehar According to a report of the agency in all small and big cities including the Iranian capital, Tehran Syed Hazrat Imam Hussein was marked with the great respect of on this occasion the rallies and meetings Aza and participate in large numbers and the Nabi Mukarram them evidence of keeping up today presented condolences to Iran of the son Nabi Mukarram Hazrat Imam Hussein of Karbala in the field of the great traditions and mourning in memory of sacrifice is Syed Hazrat Imam Hussain of Karbala in the field of the memory of the recent example of sacrifice and on a large scale participate in the meetings and rallies. 
Israeli troops to retreat from Gaza area The Palestinian mujahideen great loyalty 
Mehar agency's Urdu service According to the 16th day of the battle in Gaza also Israel's civilian population to continued bombardment on Gaza, Israel till now in the air, ground and naval attacks 880 people have been killed and 3700 Palestinian injured 
martyrs at 275 innocent are also among the treachery of Arab leaders and international human rights organizations called on smiled, lives in the embrace of death. 
Funeral of Gaza today Mujahidins area in forced Israeli soldiers at the and support the power of faith and martyrdom are Show great firmness and loyalty and Zionists are narrow to rhyme Hayat on enemy 
If the Egyptian president Hosni ominous, Hamas would not deeply and brave Mujahid treachery to Israel when it has four away from defeat but from the Israeli siege with Egypt has also Muslims had surrounded the Palestinians is the most tragic incident which Arab history 
governments of Saudi Arabia and Jordan, political, economic help items are sent to Israel and Gaza with unarmed Muslims of treason and being with the Israelis. 
Iran will adopt new strategy with the United States 
Mehar elected president of the United States, According to the report, The agency with ABC news channel, said that while talking on the Iran issue will adopt new practical and modern jobs. 
said that "Iran will be a very big challenges for the US Government". 
Palestinian Islamic organization to said that the Iranian support of Hezbollah and Hamas and concern over Iran's nuclear program. 
But he present in Iran about the US President Bush's policy will not continue and relations with Iran will adopt different in connection with the policy. 
said that on his real aim to completely clear, mutual respect and will give upon the desire of talks. 
also has said in the past that talking to Iran first in connection with any life not imposed conditions. 
During the interview, He expressed the hope that his administration with regard to Iran will follow up this new practical jobs. 
said about the Middle East crisis, that they are formed a special team in this regard. 
20 for the establishment of peace efforts in the middle of January after will start working. 
incompetent and President Bush Bush addressed the last press in admits its mistakes. 
Mehar copy in connection with the agency told the Associated Press that the US President George Bush in his last press conference, many admitted its mistake and crime. 
While addressing a press conference at the White House, President Bush said that the newly elected President than the gesture of good feelings have, However, for the biggest challenge will be to prevent possible attacks on the United States. 
He said that the completion of the mission in Iraq and social security reforms were his mistakes. 
President Bush has said that he did whatever 100 for the protection of the United States. 
The Israeli aggression in Gaza in response to several questions about President Bush has said that Israel has the right to defend their According to Hamas does not have the right to defend himself and Hamas should not stand hands on Israel and the United States like the world should cow of Iraq instead of brutal Gila 
Beneath incompetent and president said that the United States not to provide weapons to Hamas. while the United States to Israel from most of the world is deadly and destructive weapons provided the Palestinians massacred in Israel is gain from American weapons Bush has Nawaz also praised the Arabs and ratings a friend of Israel. 
Bush has in the Abu Ghraib and jails expressed embarrassment on some crimes. 
Observers say Bush is a war crimes case should be established and the organizations will give do this work will be a big favor on his humanity. 
President of the leaders of the Arab countries, The Iranian President Ahmadinejad has expressed the concern over silence 
Mehar According to a report of the agency said that the Iranian president Dr. Nejad injustice and oppression of the Israeli aggression on Gaza and its silence on leaders took place at the criticism expressed his regret. 
origin was the head of the Arab countries and their summits of silence on Israel's barbaric action on Gaza on surprise of Palestinian people, has said that Israel lettuce is to Palestinian civilians, women and children is its barbarism and Arab did not even also issued a statement. 
President Ahmadinejad has said that all Arab countries united stance against Israel and Gaza the oppressed Muslims to Israel from injustice and oppression of evil and the innocent. 
Ahmadinejad the king of Saudi Arabia to Israel in Gaza clarified their position. about human race invasion of 
Mehar agency, According to the report, President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad, the ruler of Saudi Arabia Abdullah said in his message that the name of the country the Muslims of Saudi Arabia King of silence on human race scene in Gaza and on the murder of innocent women and children in Gaza due to encourage Islam silence is still 
President Ahmadinejad has said in the message that you about their right in the Gaza position and support the oppressed and clear differences in destroyed so that the enemies of the Islamic front of casting become failed efforts 
President Ahmadinejad has said in his message that you know that Israel 19 days human race seat on genocide took place in Gaza is innocent because the murder of innocent children houses, mosques, schools and hospitals is barbaric bombardment on Gaza The Israeli Government of unarmed Muslims in these circumstances, is badly massacred as leaders of Israel in silence in boosting 
President Ahmadinejad Abdullah said that the country and like Islamic countries have taken firm steps against Israel, these countries from, you are expectations of 
President Ahmadinejad has said that the step of Palestinians victory in Gaza will prosper. 
professionals to compel Iraq on victory will be achieved and it is promised to Almighty Allah. 
President George Bush is still a threat for the United States terrorism 
Mehar copying the agency with regard to the German mercury that the US President George Bush in his farewell speech, his successor, while addressing the nation and said that although than the seven years ago, if the United States threat of terrorism today is safe but also the United States today is hovering. 
Bush said that the attack on the United States to secure terrorist enemies are sitting raised aim with patience and intending decided to attack the United States and the United States also should not be negligent of its security. 
US President to the grief of millions of Palestinians in Gaza and defend its aggressive and wrong policies, while the president of the United States also said today that the United States is the biggest country supporting independence but observers to these statements by the president American freedom do not acknowledge reality, not because the United States is an infidel and human rights in the United States is supporting the world most turbulent country like is that Israel is not only the bloodthirsty government But it is directly participated in the crime. 
Israel because the murder of civilians, women and children and that the United States and the president of the appreciation is saying this American freedom and humanity and other places of the world in which world is 
Osama will continue in Palestine 
Mehar According to a report of the agency of Hamas representative in Lebanon Osama while talking with the French Mercury agency has said that the international ceasefire unilaterally by Israel against the efforts of a comprehensive cease fire. He said until will remain in Gaza until this time will be meaningless ceasefire to one 
Ceasefire, He said that one hand is Israel's unsuccessful attempts to avoid defeat continual has said that if Israel wants peace with this to end is that Hamas will have to accept the conditions 
Hamas leader in Lebanon have made it clear that the rest of Israeli army in Gaza Strip, live, if Israel unilaterally cease fire, the resistance will continue against it. 
Gaza people in Beirut Osama with unity while addressing a conference of the European countries to severing ties with Israel, asking 
Hamas leader said that the growing a number of martyrs and injured from our designs and courage and will be. 
On the Palestinian people, He said that become a rock in the war against the enemy resistance. 
Pakistan Taliban in North Waziristan tribal area of Pakistan has killed six people. 
Mehar Reuters agency has connection with the copy that two Afghan civilians in North Waziristan tribal area of Pakistan and the Taliban four Pakistanis killed the breakthrough in the case of espionage. 
According TO Information, Local people District Tuesday Morning Four dead Bodies were found in Tehsil Chowk AREA Of WHICH Has been SHOT and Killed. 
While two bodies were found with President acting who was shaping thrown in a market of market. 
Bodies near the letters written in Urdu are also found in which has been claimed that injures spying. 
Also President of North Waziristan place two weeks ago in Mrannshah two Afghan nationals accused of spying was murdered. 
In the last 12 days to 15 people killed was formally accused of spying for the United States. 
It should be noted that in North and South Waziristan casting during the six years more than one hundred people accused of spying was killed is on Taliban that they are involved in this type of murder cases. 
order to shut down the jail time maligned expected signature on licence 
Mehar agency, quoting sources from a today is that the US president maligned The questionnaire ordered to close to jail time would sign on 
New US President Hussain on promises of his election campaign, The import follow level, has started. 
In this regard, The president plan for the withdrawal of American troops from Iraq, has instructed to make today, while US president maligned The questionnaire ordered to close to jail time would sign on. 
Is being expected that President this order who signed today, under which family of imprisonment will be closed within a year. 
The suspected terrorists from the White House on ways of investigation successor and prisoners also ordered the ban on corruption is likely to be issued. 
President promises of the first day of his chairmanship election and start working on the first of all of his government, and action to make the transparent steps are taken. 
Observers say that the American president on the international level the United States started efforts to save the deteriorating reputation, but they get this victory in Israel's savage is very difficult because until the United States Government is firm on the support of waist till then it can not expect any good work from if the United States wants to save its reputation in the world, it should abandon less than to Israel, and this should not be involved in the crimes. 
Tony Blair Islamic organization stressed on the need to include in Hamas talks 
Mehar agency with regard to the British newspaper The Times copy that the former prime minister Tony Blair of Britain in the Middle East peace process, has stressed the need to include Hamas. 
According to the newspaper, Tony Blair has said that it is important that a way should be found through which Hamas should be brought in the Middle East peace process on the Bush only talking to Mahmoud Abbas and Hamas to ignore the clear that Western countries also severely criticized on the public and Nizami of the Hamas force to steam and now it are to be included in the talks before it while they were Hamas vehemently by a terrorist organization to a terrorist organization to his home which is looking to defend their country from others, is the struggle to hold free and country like Israel occupied the House of government which has kept possession from freezing 60 years. 
Murder of the traders of Baluchistan in Karachi, Quetta Complete Strike in 
In Karachi on Thursday against the death of the four businessmen Balochistan was complete strike in Quetta and other areas. 
During this all business centers were closed when traffic was also less than usual. 
Protest strike the appeal of the association and cattle Baluchistan, got Milli Awami Party Jamiat Islam scholars had to alleged that these businessmen, Karachi police at the time of the alleged shooting in his car when he killed Tariq reached his showroom of vehicles on the road. 
cattle President Abdul Kalam Kakar demanded the arrested Police personnel involved in that incident and action will be taken against him. 
However this immediately about the incident, a Karachi police did not stand. 
killed the four businessmen to belong to the border town of Chaman. 
Strike on behalf of the government on the occasion of the security measures were taken on a large scale and eligible at important places throughout the city police car were deployed. 
commander of Hamas was killed in Israeli attack 
Israel air of a commander of Hamas was killed in the attack. 
The Israel in the Gaza Strip a week in attacks from the other important personality killing of Hamas. 
Hamas officials said that Abu Zakariya located in the east of Gaza City on Saturday, in localities were killed. 
Israel on Thursday in another air attack The gaunt world of Hamas were killed. 
Torch exile leader of Hamas Khalid living in Syria has expressed determination to take revenge against the ground attack on Gaza and Israel warned. 
On the border of Israel, Gaza Thousands of soldiers and tanks are deployed and the military are waiting for orders. 
United States has appealed for a cease fire. but said that the army on Gaza suicide or the decision not to depend on Israel. 
US President George Bush in his weekly speech Saturday on the radio for Hamas violence on charges of provocation stupendously and her of the rocket attacks on Israel as terrorism. 
He said that the United States is working for the cease fire, but no one bilateral agreement will not be acceptable. 
Three dead bodies found in North Waziristan 
Pakistani security officials have said that the bodies of three men in the tribal area of North Waziristan were found. 
Taliban suspect that they took the death penalty was killed. 
The bodies found near Miran Shah, North Waziristan's central city are and get such with them on their men in which has been accused of spying for the United States. 
Officials have said that one of them is probably the local man at the body which was last week. 
He said that bullets to filter the remaining two bodies of Afghan nationals. 
tenth day Israeli attack in Gaza continue 
Israeli missile attack of the Palestinian child injured in Israel's land forces in the entire area of the Gaza Strip against the Hamas in the tenth while Israeli air attack on suspected hideouts of militants elements continue. 
Israeli Defense Minister once 2 said on Monday that military action at the time will continue until the people of South Israel Hamas not be safe from attacks of the rockets. 
However despite attacks, Israel is continuing the firing of rockets by Hamas in Israel in which four people were killed including three ordinary citizens. 
Hamas leader Mahmoud Monday, He stressed on his colleagues that the Israeli forces to give ran and attacking Israeli citizens. 
But a Hamas official has said that the Organization of their latest violence day Monday to consider the circumstances are intention to send a delegation. 
A Palestinian woman injured in Gaza, medical sources in Gaza said that تقریباً530 people have been killed in the last 10 days, and he who were killed on Monday in 11عام civilians who were at least five 
His death of a soldier in the ground attack Israel and مزید30کے reportedly injured. 
Israel News of the military action to foreign journalists from entering the Gaza is allowed. 
Elected US Vice President Joseph arrived in Pakistan 
The foreign minister elected US president welcomed The 
The United States elected vice president Joseph along with his delegation on a visit to Pakistan have arrived in Islamabad on Friday. 
External Affairs Minister Shah Mahmood Qureshi and high officials of the American embassy, welcomed him. 
US سینیٹرLindsy Grahamبھی in this tour with 
US embassy press officer of low told Voice of America that newly elected president During his visit different from the Pakistani leadership will hold talks on regional issues, However, he avoided to tell More details. 
According to the Foreign Office sources, government officials, as well as chief of army chief Joseph Advocate General Ashfaq Pervez will also met with. 
In these meetings is expected that important bilateral and international issues, as well as related to the war against terrorism will be also exchanged views on the issues. 
Joseph was the recipient crescent of Pakistan 
After arrival in Islamabad Joseph met with the President Asif Ali Zardari. 
The President in his meeting to set up a close ties between Pakistan and the United States vowed on their role in the recipient of honor of Pakistan. 
clarified that Joseph the last year of the US Senate Foreign Relations Committee chairman Senator with the help of the as a bill was introduced in which Pakistan during the next five years for the United States in military aid, three times the increase by 7 been recommended to quoting dollars. 
Former President Pervez Musharraf's' uniform has played an important role in the Mr. Prime Minister 
Yousaf Raza Gilani and (file photo 
Prime Minister Yousaf Raza Gilani said that the United States is elected vice president of the former President Pervez Musharraf's uniform position of the head of the army and has played an important role in cricketing for democracy in the quite of help 
Yousaf Raza Gilani this statement at Karachi Ship Yard while talking to journalists. 
Brought said that the "Pro Pakistan" or supporters of Pakistan leader and brought as of the US Senate Foreign for the Chairman of the Committee of Pakistan 15ارب Bill To dollars. 
From American spy planes in Pakistani territory to the missile attacks once again condemned the prime minister, while Pakistan has said such attacks to allow their American is not any kind of agreement with the government and the taken full for this is the issue of Pakistan's autonomy of such attacks in the limits of the country can not be allowed any 
Brought in the United States, has also expressed his optimistic that after the forming of a new government will bring changes in the policy of the United States. 
(file photo) 
Yousaf Raza Gilani said that the government has large victory to terrorists is separate from Common tribal but S planes made by the missile attack attempts by the government, and are prove harmful for terrorist tribes to get away. 
Pakistan brought said that the international community Stand by the agreed. 
The Prime Minister further said that no reliable evidence should be given, if Pakistan forces will action in their areas. 
Mumbai attacks about the prime minister Yousaf Raza Gilani their stand, said that if India should provide evidence, he will be investigated and on the basis of evidence of the involvement of get, mostly against the action will be taken according to the law of the country. 
Rahman country tour of Britain the MQM Altaf Hussain, leader of the meeting in response to a question about the prime minister said Rahman allowed their country from London. 
Quetta DSP, including four policemen were killed 
file photo 
an important highway road of Quetta one shooting by unknown people on DSP, deputy police, including four police personnel. 
Wednesday morning in a jeep and two DSP, a motorcyclist sub inspector and two constables were being that the police training center seryaab Degree College located on the road near the unidentified attackers on board the motorcycle started firing on the jeep of the police the sub inspector Mehdi and Constable Sibghatullah were killed on the spot when a DSP Hassan Ali, died after reaching hospital 
Hospital sources say that the other severely injured DSP Ghulam condition is also critical and head and neck in bullets. 
Police surrounded the area after this incident taken yet in the incident, No one has claimed responsibility. 
Death of another Indian software engineer in the United States 
Andhra Pradesh in the United States belonging to the a and software by unknown attackers shot and killed him. 
living in the 26سالہ attack two days ago in the state unknown to shot during the medical treatment in hospital has died. 
He employee of computers in the United States, and was jet was performing in services. 
Last year in Andhra Pradesh belongs to the seven student social elements in the United States hands have been killed. 
The acquisition of higher education and employment in the United States for the increasing numbers of students in their thousands of families in the province has created concern children living in the United States. 
It should be noted that the higher education and better future for the United States is given priority in Andhra Pradesh. 
Chennai in south India according to the statistics of US consulate from the U.S. visa for are taking a every year, 40 percent more than in the are from Andhra Pradesh. 
During provincial government efforts to bring the body of the deceased Hyderabad have started. 
United States are against the enemy attacks: Bush 
President George Bush In his speech last Saturday attack on the United States has stressed that he against the enemy attacks. 
Mr. Bush said that the Americans for the biggest threat still one of terrorists and attack. And he warned that the possibility of the enemies of the country are waiting with patience. and they are to attack again. 
out the President has said the United States must never should not be negligent of their safety. 
President Bush The next president Barak who also expressed best wishes for his post on Tuesday will combined. 
Newly elected President Barak on radio Saturday by the Democratic Party in his speech on the historical importance of the oath taking ceremony light. 
He said that this ceremony is a tradition as a leader of other leaders to the power transfer peace filled deep is concerned with the American greatness. 
Mr. reminded that many people in this all over the world can not even that their leader carnage or will be without powers to abandon conflict. 
Wind Sharif brothers in opinion and the Federal Interior Minister met, exchanged views on political and security issues 
Debate The largest and the ruling party in Punjab, Pakistan Muslim League and Nawaz Sharif, head of the Federal Interior Minister Ashaar opinion on Sunday between the power in the country met in Punjab's Chief Minister Shahbaz Sharif were also present. 
According to local media, possibly on Ashaar country of the leadership of Pakistan People's Party were taking any important message. 
However, Speaking to journalists after the meeting in connection with this much Ashaar Malik told no details and only said that political issues brought the Is the politics of the approval of the city, and after the Mumbai attacks recently on L. N M's leadership is given a briefing. 
In their words: 'so far as there is action Provided Information ABOUT HER. 
Not that big operation browser has in Punjab and whatever government is the Punjab and the team is set up in her IN also need the help of the Punjab government. 
Ashaar every day, Malik said that media do not tell, but L. N M's leadership to transfer of the daily. Meanwhile, Pakistan Muslim League's spokesman, Pervez Rashid has also some political issues in talking to avoid and tell said that Ashaar so they had to tell Mr. Malik, who showed. 
It should be noted that Pakistan Muslim League met with the leadership of the interior was at this time, when that government in the warm summer politics of Punjab province against P. L. Q M 20سے belonging More than administrators, Punjab Governor Salman P. L. N M, press conference with Administrators from the steps of the provincial government, rejected criticism of Pakistan People's Party belonging to the governor of Punjab is the objection on participation in this issue. 
اوباما's speech is a welcome step: President Zardari for Pakistan 
Pakistani President Asif Ali Zardari, The new President of United States, Ehud opening address of the said that while their welcome to the Muslim world with mutual interests and talk of belong to promote respect for the people of Pakistan and he is welcome. 
Brought in a statement released on Wednesday said that the US president's chief to the principles and values throughout the world reiterated the hope of a better future for the people. 
According to the statement, President Zardari said that the United States doubt with the help of the international community on peace, development in the 21st century technique to find new empire and it is the responsibility of responsibility. 
It should be noted that the president on Tuesday in his opening address, after taking the oath of office said that the United States wants new progress with the Muslim world is based on the mutual interests and mutual respect. 
Brought had assured the people in poor countries that the United States will work with them so there in social development and poverty reduction. 
Pakistan President and was appointed special representative for Afghanistan 
Richard Hall for former Hall of the United Nations Special Representative to Pakistan and Afghanistan has been appointed. 
Hall the Bosnian peace agreement in like had played an important role in. 
Hall said that Pakistan and Afghanistan on affairs of the president of are ready for consultations. 
He that it is not an easy task. 
He said that the two countries' history is very different. 
George was elected for the Middle East which is Arab Israel will try to life in the peace process. 
former senator, and he has played a role in establishing peace in Northern Ireland like. 
while talking in the State Department today said that the Middle East is a very temporary, complicated and dangerous circumstances are. 
But the United States stay there will not back down with the efforts of peace. 
Afghanistan: voter registration hazardous. 
Afghanistan's Election Commission has said that because of concern about the security in some areas of the south is delay in voter registration. 
statements in southern Afghanistan near the presidential election for the voter registration was started this week. 
But the city Commission has said that until security situation will not be better, in some areas of Halmand province can not get themselves registered voter. 
In those areas of the south has been increase in violence last year, where Taliban rebels have moved their attack on Afghan forces and international forces are given. 
During this time, Afghan forces and international forces has said that he has night of Wednesday and Thursday during clashes in Afghanistan say the prolonging of the killed at least 28جنگجوؤں. 
Nato has said that its troops in the eastern Khost province near the border with Pakistan, The air and ground attacks in 22 militants killed. 
Before the Afghan defense ministry said that Afghan forces in this province has killed eight rebels and injured two. 
It is not clear whether Afghan officials have referred to the incident. 
Two missile attack in Waziristan, killed at least 18 people 
Pakistan intelligence officials in North Waziristan has said that two suspected American missile attacks At least 18 people have been killed. 
According to the officials, without US aircraft near the town of Mir Ali in North Waziristan. three missiles on a house, in which 10 people were killed in this house. 
According to local officials, the people in five foreign war which killed. 
This area of Taliban and al Qaeda fighters in is believed to be the center of the war. 
After some of these this incident was also a missile attack on South Waziristan, in which at least eight people were killed. 
Pakistani Government despite the objections of Pakistan so far since the middle of last year in missile attack near 30 have been taken. 
Recent attacks in the United States President Ehud the first attack after coming to power. 
Bush administration claimed responsibility for these attacks or to negative from them to abstain. 
Pakistan tribal area of North Waziristan minister on Friday in a suspected American in which three missile launchers from five planes have yet 
Of those killed has not been identified. 
According to Initial Information, THIS MIssile Attack On a House in The area of Mir Ali WERE Taken. 
think that Ehud after becoming president of the first missile attack in Pakistan's tribal region 
border, in Swat, The government rejected the demand ban on girls' education 
border by officials in the Swat Taliban militants threatened to impose ban on girls' education rejected this by saying that 'It is against the law and the Islam both announced. 
Of border on Sunday, Education Minister Sardar Hussain Babar said further that the government do such efforts will not succeed. 
Their was that the extremists are trying to say that our children deprived of education in the area. 
Theft in their words: 'these people hiding schools to and children tried to operandi. 
While mentioning the atmosphere of fear and panic, brought said that the provincial government is fully aware of this and make it clear with the land of Pukhtoons wants is that no power can not to stop the development of education. 
One day before the Taliban militants have vacated under leadership of Maulana Fazal educational institutions to Swat, demanded Banning on education of girls in the violation and threatened that the educational institutions to be destroyed. 
Swat despite the military operation in 150کے approximately educational institutions during the past half year explosives by militants from setting up destroyed. 
to educational institutions in the wake of thousands of girls and boys have been deprived of the feasibility of education. 
In India the strict security measures on the occasion of Republic Day 
60th Republic Day being celebrated on Monday in India every occasion, It is very tough security arrangements and thousands of soldiers have been deployed all over the country. 
During the Republic Day parade in New Delhi military weapons, aircraft and other military equipments during the goods of the exhibition. 
Officials said that security arrangements under the aircraft tested canons and "sharp also have been deployed on the parade routes and police strict vigil while the US President Ehud has extended congratulations on this occasion to India 
of which Prime Minister Manmohan Singh on Saturday to a heart operation early recovery desire of the message. 
think that Indian police yesterday two suspected Pakistani militants after fighting in the outskirts of New Delhi claimed to have killed. 
According to local authorities, the police from these two AK 47 grenades and some documents are recovered. this show that both the Pakistani. 
Police investigation It is also that the two belong to Pakistan at the army banned organization to Mujahideen who was involved in the Mumbai attacks in November last year. 
Tea: effective treatment of breast cancer 
A new research has been told that three cup of tea in daily 
Under 50 years from drinking age risk of breast cancer in women is little more than a third. 
US state of Florida cancer Center in the research said that in less than 50 years of age of such women in breast cancer tumor 
The danger of 37 percent reduction in circumstances least three cup of tea. 
Research has also said that the women to large age three or more this cup of tea daily from drinking not have any advantage in this regard. 
Experts say that this is due to the presence of such components in tea is Which of these special kind of cancer are more effective against the target of which commonly become old women are less than 50 years. 
city of Florida State in the cancer Center in more than five thousand women on the WHO research was the treatment of breast cancer. 
15 of them were between the ages of 20 and 74. 
Experts of their medical records and life style compare from such women who were safe from breast cancer. 
Experts also found out that a special type of cancer, tea on on the words, and this drop was located in a 66 percent. 
Almost every tenth of breast cancer patient is suffering in this type. 
For this kind of cancer in depth is more dangerous because he is and it's usually enough at this time is then found when he has spread testing. 
professionals are saying that an daily minimum three cup of tea drinking regularly aged under a risk of breast cancer in women less can 
He says that the drink the tea on a daily unequivocally in body to meet their businesses create appropriate against cancer. 
About 40 thousand every year in Britain is diagnosis of breast cancer in women. 
War in Afghanistan is the biggest military challenge faced by the United States: 
US Defense Minister Robert has said that the war in Afghanistan is the biggest military challenge faced by the United States. 
today the US Senate and representatives to the members of the wisdom of the administration war on Afghanistan and Iraq were briefed about the practical. 
of the Senate Armed Services Committee, said that the only solution to the problem of the Afghanistan war but not brought further said that many areas to make safe enough for the benefit of number of soldiers are not present, gaze Taliban action. 
Why? a reduction in the exercise with age 
New research 
Exercise in every age is good for health. 
It strong heart to you is continuously, a reduction in the level of cholesterol, less weight in it is proved, assistant helps prevent diabetes by and do to slow the process of silence. 
Unfortunately many people from Omar to move in with reduction in the ability to exercise is rampant. 
Experts say that the exercise of our body and mind alert but can Influence ON This AGE. 
Of American Medical Association that exercise not to come forward many health problems. 
Mayo Clinic Dr. payment of money cudgel says that increase in age from disability and physical exercise is due to a decrease in a big performance. 
Dr. Mayo Clinic medicine are starving. 
He has big heart diseases in old and the ability to exercise of human being taken by the leadership of the one of the Studies. 
The team of doctors had heart voice to review the performance of the high waves use. 
In which the heart pumps blood, the closeness to the rest of was a study. 
Experts have kept the focus their attention on the Left Part of heart to pump blood which is a central part of. 
They came to know that age to move with the rest of the heart is increase disorders in the process. 
Dr. says that in the process of the heart with rest of becomes obvious abuses and age with the increase in its effect on the ability to exercise is widening. 
Dr. Ken were included in the study. 
They say that we see this that is essentially effect of this and it was clarified that the exercise of the bad performance of heart from the process of the comfort of how is concerned. 
Sometimes in blood pressure, heart disorders can become a cause of diseases. 
If doctors and patients of heart disorders, they will work together with the growing old, can still get the benefits of exercise. 
Detailed report about the American Medical Association has been published in the magazine. 
Not the possibility of immediate war with Pakistan: Indian army chief 
Indian army chief General Dipak released Kapoor said that Pakistan is not present the possibilities of the war immediately, but to defend the country and to ensure the protection of the interests of her to the sacrifices for all are ready. 
General Kapoor has alleged that assurances and in the Mumbai attacks despite the international pressure on Pakistan, In their words, not only the structure of terrorism on the land of Pakistan as the present situation but it is active. 
Brought said this in talking to reporters in Srinagar. 
Indian army acquitted of Kashmir under New Delhi, head of the overall security circumstances are on borders and to review of the preparation for the armed forces Kashmir was on one day visit. 
them to question was asked that media reports about the Mumbai attacks in Pakistan has offered by India has rejected the silent, this is about the comment. 
General Kapoor said that the decision of war or peace issues is the political leadership. 
Alleged Pakistan dismantle the Infrastructure OF terrorism on The land of While Mentioning, Brought to The Presence Of Such Elements of The INDIAN army said that THE Competition will be With the Who to Peace Upside AND ON Weak TO INDIA. 
Brought on the soil of Kashmir said that Indian seven to eight hundred militants there are about 50 percent in foreign. 
General Dipak Kapoor said that with the improvement in the weather of infiltration from Pakistan and Kashmir under her efforts in the may be vigilance on borders, However, India has increased. 
Brought The Indian Kashmir under the reduction in the number of forces stationed in responded by saying that the possibility can not be agreement with the security of the country. 
God and the language of for the be, 
Though is not the also see again, and the United States in this changes to how extent are in our right 
That which Martin interpretation of dreams are what interpretation. 
reportedly part of the name of Hussein, us today to take oath as the president of history where there is As in every respect historical another tough test is also 
Not only his secure secure himself but all these people who support the heart. 
This will be also The majority of a black for his heart to these defections to not easy to accept. 
Here South Asia should keep raised hopes, remember from soldiers that he was elected President of the United States and should keep to remember that the US president is the president of the as practical. 
After some time from now on as a person, whose ethnic brother slavery closed wearing their alma reportedly blood and the United States were brought home the term of modern today is the most powerful state of this nation victim of racial discrimination, representative of the United States Togare president will 
This one person to a lot of the people have been linked, many expectations 
Her lover on those it is that this person not realistic hopes around. 
If hatred spreading like race, religion basis in the world to become successful in to ease, It will win the eradication. 
filled with South Asia this change will happening of meaningful change in American policy in this regard can be expected. 
Pakistan and the United States will this change HOW Influence ON Relations. 
'(BBC) 
tons, or any and, concerning the policy, to determine the nature of relations and 118.2 achieve billionaires, Influential, Strong AND Influence of The jewish Lobby is THE top priority. 
And as far as Pakistan is concerned, recent India, Israel and the United States in connection with the Mumbai blasts triangle of aggressive attitude before the world. 
Pakistan after becoming also arranged long Suwat, all of which was responsible for the Swat regular army and law. 
He has an agreement under the arrangement of Swat handed over to the government sins, 
But regret that our governments with Swat treated like mother. 
Swat the Swat in government after the end of the number of schools increase was not just in 
And there was interest in the construction and development. 
In the present time number of girls education was the former era to several times. 
Local Taliban in Pakistan's North West Frontier Province by the educational institutions is continuing to set a target. 
Most of the school have been destroyed in Swat district in which most of the girls. 
So not only on the education of girls in the Swat Taliban ban has been announced. 
Thousands of students and education are deprived of the acquisition of. 
What you think is that girls want to finish the links of the Taliban to get. 
So far their government was unable to stop illegal measures. 
What do you think the government should. 
The question should be that the ISI and what will get. 
Because the Swat people now understand this game is imperative that serve the Taliban army there is for them to kill the otherwise not only one night curfew in five school How can curfew slaughtered to people in the city's main Chowk in how can be. 
Swat when I set up the writ of government not being given the, such government in steps to stop illegal in how successful it? 
Now the question that when armed forces had recovered, modern, modern technology and spying weapons system and others all the government, has four Taliban control. why not? 
answer is that any On the head of these 'secret' Monday that neither of them is the hand of weapons is ended and caught it. 
Kalam that it's his black Taliban get through 'world colonialism, are easy task 
Now continue war in Afghanistan to 15 years ago. 
ISI was the Taliban control, While help opposite Northern Alliance which was to help Russia, India and Iran. 
Then suddenly changed the situation of Taliban started coming before Operation 
And ISI to abundance from America's offer came so former friend will become enemies. 
Now, The situation is that war is still continuing, but also those who help in Iran, India and Russia 
As long as human beings and not have created this feeling that what is right and wrong is only human mistake by then. 
As an example of when a thief Stealing is to come if this at the time to think that, not good to theft and theft is a curse, and he is also from God punishment in this will not stolen Human 
Similar to when Israel should not be the feeling that I am I wrong and bloodshed of and this will get the punishment till then in Gaza they will be playing with the blood of the holy. 
Etiquette! 
The question that war, armed movement, terrorism is to solve the problems? 
If not, then he which chemist who is taking toward the solution of problems? 
It correct that war does not solve problems but their way, fanatical blessing 'in' afterward. 
Palestine, Afghanistan, Iraq, to secure the success of his movements must adopt this model was taken by the Nelson Mandela in South Africa. 
More than armed struggle to 'Jihad' psychological and moral 
Kashmiris seems to take part in the election is that he has accepted the 
Is third week of Israeli attacks on Gaza and the number of deaths has reached near of one thousand. 
Yet in spite of the international diplomatic efforts is planning could not be the war 
Interaction according to estimates, after the attacks, starting from December 27 90 thousand Palestinians from their left their houses have been transferred by the safe areas. 
Israel, relief agencies to the issue of Palestinian children's protection earthquakes, accusing said that accusations of committing an entire generation of Palestinian children will be facing serious psychological and emotional problems. 
What you are saying. 
What should be? 
How lasting peace is possible in Gaza? 
Click here for details 
Grace notes comments that only due to the increasing number of letter in Urdu the opinions will be published. 
On board the online for the screenplay Alt shift will pressure Urdu.) 
Taliban given a chance pavernent 
Basit, Peshawar 
Fortunes began to go if Taliban real jihad the innocent people who will 
Girls who burnt the school? 
And kidnapping for ransom or get no ransom, the US intelligence and payment to the people who will bureaucracy? saying 
He has caused so much harm to the Taliban as not by any nation or religion. 
Pashtun 
Pakistan 
together all the Islamic world to attack Israel if the only threatened give, you will see that Israel Abba presence of how the United States will be hurt 
Not only the ceasefire and immediately real ceasefire talks but will also be. 
But what so much heart liver, where to honour our Muslim rulers will bring. 
Any Ahmed Nejad will tell you that the initiative of the BBC Two why your courage in the forum are the big boom. 
Responsibility of establishing peace and human rights only, or Hindus Alam on the Arabs do not imposed but it is the duty of the world nations that take voice against the atrocity. 
This tragic incident in the bush taken so far of sins is the worst. 
June 30 in India and Pakistan, which means in government institutions before the end of the financial year plunder are just as the American administration has green signal to Israel before the end of his wishes that may 
A ceasefire in the United States says that will be tried for, 
On the other hand resolution United Nations resolution is accepted, But practically, both did nothing is slipping, it is only a means that United Nations also surge to crush Muslims fighting. 
membership of the United Nations immediately all Muslim countries on the basis of his international organization should end and should harms. 
About the examples are many, where our only promises and resolutions of the United Nations and the United States in the front comes loss was only to Muslims. 
Benefit of them when the BBC is to publish some miserable is not 
buried now where all the emotions principle improperly blood flowing of particularly Muslim, on BBC Board be so. 
Although accounting himself right to knowledge deprived 
Some burst, by far less talk, the limit of this meanness that comments by 
From Muslims. 
Jews in you and the difference is in Jewish themselves say, are killing Muslims and ask you as Muslims to their own Muslim living in the Muslims 
[syja786] 
BBC's quite never, ever suicide attacks in a certain under the pretext of terrorism in India is being targeted schools 
These remarks against Islam is a favorite word extremism 
But extremists who is above you saw the comments against Iran to fully which has been imposed about Kafr on writing. 
When our Muslims will understand that the could not contest with sword. 
unarmed people in Israel's bombing the heart to see what not cried tears of blood? 
But basic of this violence and murder and penetrated the fault is by the name of jihad which we beautiful face of Islam tried to meet. 
When the majority of Palestinians already accepted the existence of Israel, What Hamas need that the rockets on Israel or force the suicide attack. 
Both sides are Ki attitude of humanity. 
Role of the United States and the United Nations then we support to Israel's atrocities. 
God giving a strength of the Amen, 
Terrorism and terrorists to the pain of terrorism to delivered of Nobel also to think that real work, are 
What otherwise terrorism on a large scale without lenses of Sardar generation of support and it is who are all know. 
such as in plain language in grandfather Gary, It is said that the low to the. 
Fico of great, on his head and cried also killed. 
Injured and Funeral for those who died for the drugs, money, and asked the Arab rulers are being. 
Israeli attack, should be? 
Actually issue is that the heads of all Muslim countries, including Saudi negligence, not sleeping in their army and no defense plan bus think that was his responsibility for aid. 
They should immediately to practical steps against Israel. 
Closure of petrol as the United States and European countries but regret in them. 
All brothers and sisters to salute! 
I think in this difficult moment Hamas to abandon its struggle in the name of peace to give advice and injustice with thousands of millions of widows and is tantamount to prove they failed. 
Israel and its supporters soon if his On the peak of arrogance, Musa also will be Born in his home because this is divine law America and the steps taken by Israel to create suicide bomber in Muslims are working in fertilizers. 
Who expanses of power in bacchanalian elephants I do not understand. 
Abu Abdullah Pakistan 
Now Hamas and Israel should take the compromise so blood and evil shut. 
Mohammad Sarfaraz, Paris, France 
Just rang said. 
Are duty that Hamas hundred percentage is right on the Truth and Jihad 'against the court of conquers' in 'least also wants is to be, then it should be so, must know that if died from good take home, then love can not good. 
People who love, His Prophet from God, love and claimed his love of religion, to love human study is part of faith! 
means that Muslims' as After the People of the Book 'world live in them, from the face of the earth is God's order by bombarding 
Najib Rehman Lahore [P KI $T N] 
No order is not but they have ordered to the invitation to Islam 
But questioning conspiring against the is the order of jihad against them will 
time with these people not end conspiring pitting until they destroyed but it is not marry mean that exploded in the wearing jackets 
Brothers, causes the destruction of killer of children. 
But from my friends is requested that the Israelis had no shelter, they were so strong that today in the world considers not because of any Jewish are one. 
Nor Sunni, Shiite, not in them all Jewish bus. and he made every thing every development in the field. 
Of the 55 Islamic countries is the state? 
behind in every field and now it is helpless situation is such that they have are enemies and are waiting for death. 
It is necessary that all Muslim countries together and be united against Israel should prepare a 
Feroz Magsi, Jhang, Pakistan 
And its good action, no and that Israel should accept the learning, the way the development of modern science and to live in peace and China to the world. 
Muslims have also very lands and Sources. 
Need is correct use. 
First of all, this tragic aspect is that Hamas and Fatah could not be unity in. 
Like Yasir Arafat and Sheikh Yasin to organize great leaders killed by the way it was that the Aqsa mosque for 'Jihad' to the region only attribute this nation can be weak and until Yasin and Arafat must not have been cleared through this was impossible. 
Of The World see that these two leaders after the death of Palestine moment to moment is how 
And the Jewish lobby moment to moment how their clutches the NSG from the NSG went off. 
This international trust the owner of a Pakistani prime minister in 1974 was 100 percent for the first time in history that the attendance with all Muslims had come under a roof of the leaders. 
On this day birth today. This is a very difficult task should pledge that this nation that not only will set up unity among its ranks 
But other Muslims differences also While the (Islamic) for establishment of Commonwealth of unfinished mission will be increased ahead? 
This is the one which has been to from half a century 
Many of which this are the mouth 
Any other Her face which it many times in the worst forgetting the pressure of the world and Paddy. 
And this the other face of Iraq which Afghanistan are eating Iran virtues in Pakistan 
And most of which it is because it knows which is that when this also out it was only Muslims and Muslim scholar of Islam and practical firm will expelled Islam because history shows that Islam is the big are on the right path. 
Israel's war planes from the bombing and a series of missile attacks on Gaza is continuing since December 27. 
In these attacks so far more than three hundred Palestinian citizens have been killed. 
Air attacks now after the Israeli tanks and armored vehicles ground action with complete the preparation of have arrived on the borders of Gaza. 
The United Nations Security Council unanimously passed Resolution in an emergency meeting with the Palestinian Authority and Israel through immediately on what is demanded to stop the violent actions. 
However, Israeli officials said that it will continue their operations in Gaza for time until they believe are not that will be stopped rocket attacks on Israel. 
In your opinion what Israel is correct to say that this Israeli action is trying to defend the unity and integrity? 
In this situation, The international community is playing the role? 
What this aggressive action of indirect belong to the next elections in Israel? 
Newly elected President of the United States after assuming the post of Middle East can be expected of the improvement in the situation is? 
Grace notes comments that only due to the increasing number of letter in Urdu the opinions will be published. 
On board the online for the screenplay Alt shift will pressure Urdu.) 
Palestine There is a most sacred place for Muslims to the world and this is our must protect the part 
And we also remember needs to keep it tone is first 
India a day to the United States and Israel fail is miserable because this country, for the break and God they become unbelievers must to punishment on Sajid Sadiq, 
"when tears pretext is cabin with night 
From only prayers when any "(Nawabzada Nasrullah Khan) 
Such comments, published by BBC explored exploration. 
End and of impression is maintain. 
Though the BBC news reports are correct, But the real thing a way. 
To highlight what is and what is less importance of news. 
etc.. 
Zaheer Chughtai 
This now our Pakistani electronic media, especially columns and also not back any one who growing extremism and terrorism here on this or writes in the coverage of so trunk are whipped 
said the United Nations is apparently of peace, human rights and things. but Muslims as the limits of oppression and tyranny, and it is the same words are to hear from the mouth when Hamas to stop attacks until this dual policy will continue. 
Muslim why there is so much cruelty as if the United States left people like Jews backing them, Allah has clearly said that this nation MOST Infamous spent the LIFE of The Nation and this Nation will never Can not Spend LIFE IF Properly Courage America has the backing Of And then WATCH THAT his Fortune 
Called the world and Murder in the name of peace fell to understand this clearly ask that peace in the world, only justice to miserable set up blockades "injustice and generation scene. 
If generation suicide miserable from any nation can be eliminated to administer the results can be gained, according Measures not only maintain existence of Jews since the peak of pounds but like a bargain impossible today. 
According to Poet 
cruelty "is growing, It is bridged 
blood "is Jim is considered 
Who will tell now that What is terrorism? 
It all in the terrorism do not are all their pain and their only 
what people do not have low or of has been A of color was not 
And now any condolence message from anywhere do not? 
In the proceedings of the Mumbai attacks had seen such as my home have caught fire in it and it can not see that the sparing sparing lenses do not wish a think 
Dead bodies on the road, fend injured and sink in blood innocent face condemned how that will not find words 
Muslims is evident that regret on the one hand on the helpless people were killed in India, the entire world is increasingly without evidence on Pakistan action that otherwise we will 
And on the other hand, Israel publicly quiet race is genocide of the Muslims and the world it is unbearable 
have long darkness and when it would end the darkness Nagri, not. 
Hence the integrity of Israel in the United States is a joke. 
Talk was welcomed, The ruling Public Elections for this type of actions in this course will especially a state like Israel, what the remaining Barak to witness history. today was no American ruling against the policy and would not be colonialism is only white or black is colonialism. 
Discussion forum continue in it is that everyone is about the pain of the demise of Benazir as politicians but was not ignore their shortcomings. 
This debate is that Benazir summoned for the life of the power or for the sake of democracy. 
If democracy Aziz that clearance, The US and the deal was 10 years kept Why leave in Musharraf's dictatorship to the public? 
Benazir Bhutto then Pakistan not come when affected dictatorship. unfortunately, he still need to visit Pakistan and release from cases when they believe were probed ensured of power 
Historic virtues to pick up the tree on the accusations is being, not only to say anything. 
Sana Khan 
Some things are ignored it can not be thinking that some of them. 
Another reader 
Respected you may has not only in Pakistan but history (Sir), about his four in friendly countries and seven other countries also should read Perhaps Mr. ok you talk of it. 
Tariq Ayaz 
'not only be nature of which he trained to able 
Was not living green water in photos The armpit for 
Britain has never has not been a Hindu and Muslim invention of the development issue Sir Syed. 

How cruel our nation is their time and Shaun writes in his party are blind, but now, every historic virtues heavy intellectuals to pick up the allegations and is being criticized the No say anything on this, not only the. 
Development we People, very. 
Sana Khan 
Some things are ignored it, thinking, that some of them may not be as having books to used to not be stupid Alam 
Although after Mumbai attack in dialogue process between Pakistan and India, the damage was born, so we want to keep the to continue dialogue between Pakistan and India. 
If we will talk of war, will be a loss of human lives from both sides. 
India has said that Pakistan was arrested in Mumbai attack civilians and this is in Urdu, Pakistan is also sent by writing a letter but on the other hand, India has caught before when this extremist, said that this is a very big engineer but he only to four after the party has declared the Watch the thing. 
First of all, Mr. approve and all Christian friends to the forum of Christmas Mubarak. 
Colleagues of FORUM: Raza, sister Sana, sister Shahida Akram and all evening. 
Fires but not the war we all want flowers of peace! 
War is, itself a problem 
War will give the solution of the issues 
Fire and blood will today 
hunger and poverty will tomorrow 
This knowledgeable people for 
War we are better. 
You and in our area 
candle burning, we are better. 
relations India now have very deep impact and India surely knows that time will give the United States open to Pakistan tactics. 
Same old also is the United States. 
When Indian attack in case the United States will also be achieved its objectives and India also will be spent. 
Pakistan should clear activity will announce that we will not compromise But then the aggression talk of a ceasefire and peace at this time will not be until India not to completely damaged or take over by not why we ourselves for it, whether it be destroyed. 
This is the Islamic history. 
Before this resolution was the Pakistani people and army to the message he is given. 
compensate attacks of the acquisition of extra diplomatic and military benefits in Indian efforts it affected more droll are party even strict international reaction, initially the contrary, now the world is less pressure on Pakistan. 
India presents the unnecessary noises about not transported, The United Nations expressed satisfaction at Pakistan's efforts to Pakistan's efforts, The head of Interpol and praise of the need for more diplomacy India 'side 
No Two opinion on the fact that this is a very brutal. 
But it is a question that when thousands of Taliban Monday attacker were ninety Sami Ullah, where Pakistani army was and was making? 
The army should not be accountability that what he did there in one year? 
Every day the thousands of mortar shells of tanks and many of them are uneasy Taliban were killed? 
In S. I. I appeal to that harm should leave supporting Taliban and we in heaven Benazir Swat should live in peace. 
And these fake operation off. 
At the United Nations in the day when Pakistan military intervention will have become such as the resolution of the party against the have occurred. 
Riaz Ahmed Farooqi 
First, our extremist and his supporters for his action against the All are being provided and justification and proof the day also such a resolution was presented, all possibilities that have no voice in the United Nations will not got in our right, 
This resolution and accepting the delay, in the United States were placed before any example of his power will increasingly run under the help. 
Sami Monday of God's personality and achievements We do not Information AND Knowledge THAT The activities WERE. 
Perhaps he was no revolutionary. 
Comrade chairman, which Nawab Bugti, Dr. Najib and thousands of dead bodies of revolutionaries of the disgraced by the enemy. 
He also action are dying. 
But here, one international game is being played here, horror and brutality to the people being afraid of the rule. 
So could be created the reason that if we will not, such inhuman and will occupy the coming government. 
Called Islam in the name of religion is condemned by the movement militants. 
Supporters of these extremists are seen cruelty to the United States, But instead of brutal actions like this sorry they named as tribal traditions 2 clean mining fish. 
Scares tribal traditions of Capote end a name of Islam and the reason of this barbaric action can not be any near the heart. 
I think our army has met with his people. 
They do that when the people, they move in this time, is close to catch it, so much for the reach on occasion, but he will be away, if they are there, There are darn cycle. 
What these people so that they are brave 50 to 70 men as hostage and our forces hand its hands is like spectators to watch it. 
They are virtues of Allah, and the army. 
Is clear that pulse in some Kala. 
Ziaul Haq deserve the time away from the dictatorship of God graciousness and graciousness contrary to highlight the qualities of the kinds of and in the name of religion from set up the atmosphere of fear seen. this is in addition to the body incident and literature chanting 'books like' what will happen after the death also fear created. 
And they just worldly and fear the dignity and for Jalal as equipment or are using the. 

hell you to where it is threatened 
'The case of fear that became itself 
It is surprising when it is said that this is not the work of any Muslim can be. 
We ourselves are from history itself or eye to hide. 
Wisal after Prophet refused on Rasool of closed door ablaze and see what the embraced her husband who was riding with dragged put a guy in? 
Whether they had come from outside anywhere? 
Yazid of Medina on army invasions and Karbala was the axis of cronies and assuaged? 
Facts without accept motives away, nor has countered. 
BBC closed dual policy. 
Better Super title away from this topic: 'Bush was legitimate or illegitimate impact shoes? 
'should be. 
Japan 
Yar some grave to man a shame out from poles have been lingering from projects that it has raised voice against the atrocity, and you is lying to the topic of box office. 
lion-hearted operation for the success of the operation and the second to border line depends on the success of depends on is that who is in favor of the ordinary people. 
It is the American and Pakistani agencies and Monday, have been a victim of a conspiracy. 
Now in this forum will be based on all the Taliban opposition comment because the secret to success in the Taliban have been included the common people, and they are taking actions which could change opinion. 
In, The only question be recommended kidnapping that when the body reactor for a full day, the army was what the common people, only make a target bananas There are who also Some this statement, The bombardment on the whereabouts of houses to collapse 2 children killed and his mother 
did not know about this Chowk of 
Or was looking fun? 
We wish hand manipulation and request that closed the game to secure God. 
Above the end you also a ruling. 
question was asked by the BBC, of those writing a reasonable not be sorry to see it is, for example, a question has not asked that 30 thousand in Swat army has to do? 
The army to help the Taliban fight throughout the day of the dead bodies of those on Poles. 
Swati green step with the people, what the Pakistani army, but media including the BBC World, to put a real knowledge from the reality is not good. 
Pakistani army drama. 
Swat child that is that this is a bloody drama. 
drama will harm. 
Taliban them by name the bad of the Muslims. 
If true Muslims all over the world in the area of them if they do not say why place to these terrorists. 
becomes the honor of which are hard to do not pay heavy gun, They are included in the group. 
guns or stressed the sword of Islam has not. 
Shame. 
Its not justify is not in any family traditions in any religion. 
Including all BBC media about the Taliban and tribes his commentary from different sources. 
But a real situation not only to know that what is right situation, we know because we are tribal. 
Briefly that it is a game, crashed envoy, raw, and our crashed nor any students have included an ISI is not tribal these miscreants Islam, schools, Pashtun, Taliban elements who are nation, are maligned tribes and tribal traditions. 
All Muslims with the movement's head in shame nonsense. 
MQM leader in Hussain to BNP and the leadership of the PPP I present a slam to which it against cancer, speaking against the Taliban. 
Zia ul Haq, he himself is production of this cancer, but Pakistan was also were destroyed. 
But I am hopeful that the present leadership will end the cancer. 
After the Mumbai attacks, India said that these attacks behind Pakistan has played some of the extremist elements. 
Pakistan has denied the charges and said that he will take every possible help for India in the investigation. 
India has said that it has given Pakistan a list of suspected extremists in which his base are given name, who are required to India. 
Now in Pakistan has said that the list included Mohammad and are not suspects Maulana Masood Azhar, head of the Pakistan government has NO Information ABOUT Him. 
Before this, Asif Ali Zardari, The President of Pakistan rejected this impression that Western intelligence agencies and the Indian government to Pakistan provided evidence related to the Mumbai attacks. 
President Ajmal Butcher, said that it was not proved that he is a Pakistani. 
During this Prime Minister Manmohan Singh warned Pakistan that its relations with India should still can not improve until the land there will be used for terrorism. 
And India In the latest progress of the Pakistan cricket team has cancelled his visit. 
Do they affect sports political incidents should occur? 
You see the future of relations of Pakistan and India are? 
Pakistan nor America wo India. 
Pakistani will himself on Pakistan. 
So regionalism after sectarian and what you have. 
Though the Jinnah did not also good with the Muslims of India has proved this time. 
Yasmin, Chicago 
Mrs. If Mr. Jinnah regionalism, not on the vision of continues work, and cancer in Pakistan and not treated it with the Muslims in India. 
But our mistake is that they could not as a leader of height. 
We can not if the value of their heroes, 
Many qualities in the region. 
God knows when intelligence will come and blessing of agreed development to the region. 
Found in both countries, pundit, Taliban, Shiv Sena, R. S. S. others have been prepared, the enemy of peace. 
powers and not want that this region will develop with the peace so puppet dance to their countries is being 
Do you can imagine that agreed with the area of Pakistan and India and China will be a place in the World. 
On Pakistan, God is the punishment of thieves and robbers militants to otherwise leader has imposed on the nation. 
God will never any did not affect our country on Pakistan, Amen. 
But Sahib, little the situation around their own eyes and see ground realities, you should come see where that U.S. forces would have been reached. 
Besides it national issues are also coming not correct, border, also the Karachi in Sindh and Baluchistan are in front of you. 
In such a situation, the country needs a leader who is we could make a united nation. 
Or mercy Allah we respond. 
I think one of the last war without no way. 
Has bus. 
Register now issue should be or across it. 
The talks issue will not be solved. 
Not only with small bumper terror in each other's countries. 
To end Europe also declared after the last great fight, occurred. 
And it also was not great, this war until today like Pakistan and India's altercation are doing altercation. 
Our almost all political parties they agreed on the fact that should be elimination of terrorism from the country and sectarian. 
But do not see our sincere military leadership in this work, on the one hand, The United States and Europe are assured that we are with you in this war of terrorism on the other hand, Taliban intelligence, help. 
We think now is to fix its direction and the only one has to choose, thanks to the way 
is in no doubt that this party majority in battalion, which is host of the Mujahideen activists of the Mujahideen freezes absolve the party after established by the name of Pakistan were included in a party, 
However, after their workers preferred to the relief work and now India strongly stressed on the insistence on The United Nations has also declared banned and continue his crackdown against the Pakistan Government,. 
In my opinion if the jihadi groups religious left religious extremism and relief efforts continue, the better. 
organizations in Pakistan who professionalism in the name of jihad and criminals are Paul keep it have the same 'big' to Pakistan are and what to say. 
Now in Pakistan to left no stone. 
Real Muslims, in the human not entitled to. 
Pakistan without their free from insurgents to national security will be in danger. 
What is still capacity to think that they should be banned? not that 
fanatic place anywhere in the world is not the work murder tournaments. 
This news from heart a thief is a thief. 
In Islam that this is what world where today an important member of taking the name also is very difficult to survive in this for the world. 
Muslim, they can kill Muslims, but also try to take revenge if the Muslim, with all the Muslim world's all his hypocrite ruling also a true and sincere people of the grief of the same religion, who treated today are with our great leader Hafiz Saeed. 
Price of Mumbai attacks in India. 
Pakistan ties in bitterness has been created and the relationship between the two countries, imposed a severe blow to the improvement in recent years. 
India continuous military and military groups active in Pakistan is to hold responsible 
And coming back on normal relations to be conditional on action against these groups is. 
While Indian security institutions for the Mumbai attacks force is directly responsible Nepalese Mujahideen 
Repeatedly party in this regard, the name of front also wow. 
This is not the first time that India is a terrorist operation in the relations between the two countries due to be serious. 
The attack on Indian parliament in December 2002 after the two neighboring were on the brink of war. 
Two Army in 2002, after the Mujahideen and imposed ban on it was included in the list of terrorist groups. 
Now party on in which security analyst, says that the real power in the Mujahideen is new shape, ban is being demanded. 
In your opinion, should be imposed the ban on the group or not? 
Pakistan have active on its soil should take decisive action against extremist groups? 
The party present to ban imposed on India. 
Pakistan crisis can get out of the way and lasting peace between the two countries for the armed groups of how is necessary to be stopped? 
The United Nations Security Council has imposed ban on the party end, have the evidence on which the Security Council seems so hurry? 
The Security Council not always so activity against the Muslims? 
Witness says that plaintiff slow, smart it! 
India would be viewed itself has become a failed state. 
Intelligence, the army and other security institutions which have failed. few 72 hours in the hands of the terrorists, who are far dance dance and India accused Pakistan of its failure This is giving up the entire world on tactics. 
A non murder be noise in the whole world are liable why the double standards? 
Only the country welfare organization. 
Furqan Farooq, Faisalabad 
Until our prophet Saint scholars and all people to respect and love, so Islam with and spread 
Muslims also every development in the field. 
the beautiful religion exaggerate in teaches and non apartheid. The started opening a new chapter and violence which was not aware before the world. 
Should. Mr. Salam wants to do but insisting on your bill this action. 
The United States should not come under pressure. 
If India should provide proof to pain, no? 
Why does not He? 
And why on allegation of every thing we used? 
Even in India, are extremist groups and organizations, why not accusing restrictions on them these people? 
All what we are as a terrorist in the world? 
India, which is in Kashmir, What is he? 
what Israel is doing what he is? 
If it is true that we are World's first nuclear Islamic state, Why are this conflict. 
Pakistan now is in the final stages. 
kamranhassan, ABU DHABI 
Is your heart to talk and some conditions are also saw the coming 
Now, American magazines published a map of Pakistan with the in new and it is set to snatch the sanctions is also part of this off. 
American slowly but not now very quickly from its grip on Pakistan are NSG. 
People in such a situation, if we as a nation, do not show of unity can become too if Bangladesh remember is, and some may be, too. 
Around scare as also condemned the attacks, It is less, whether they be in the Hotel in Mumbai, or be hotel in Islamabad and or in Palestine. 
Also the terrorists where they like this should be the end of whether they are Pakistani, Indian and US or Israeli. 
Now the question is that every day are the terrorist attack in Pakistan, hundreds of people were killed, including Pakistani officials on why the world is silent? 
What was on hotel attack was not the terrorists? 
Then why. 
Devoted go home Rahman Mr. Malik, many G, and is undaunted! 
According to the BBC, "where a committee) of the United Nations Security Council has imposed ban on the party Mr. Malik said there is that we have not banned. and a lot of thought and consideration will be only after it 
Not only According to the BBC, Mr. Malik said also to this impression with the full force arrests of terrorists has denied that any, process are being brought in. 
OK, 
Or not to keep the ability or to keep it wants not say that. 
We are fighting a war, The Pakistani who. 
And why our interests which are where we effort. 
Someone To is not to interfere in the affairs of the country. 
Lacking the era of colonialists apparently. 
If people have to expect justice or coalition stressed on the implementation of independent judiciary should respect of democratic institutions and a dictator or give the army should not help peace will be established in third world including Pakistan, and perhaps the allies is not acceptable. 
Pakistan, though the European and American objectives obedience is set in. 
This despite the opposition of a triumph of Pakistan's population is prevailed. 
And it is to emotions against further. 
If the US and its allies have confidence on democracy, settlement The practice to leave the respect of the sovereignty of the state, to leave the region. 
capability in Pakistan so that he himself is or 
Pakistan security forces in Kashmir under the control of the defunct army raid on a suspected camp of Mujahideen is done. 
The Mumbai attacks is increasing pressure on Pakistan after that they should speed up action against extremist organizations. 
In India's charges that the Mumbai attacks force Mujahideen's hand. 
US Foreign Minister Condoleezza Rice said that the Mumbai attacks from the Pakistani leadership against the trustees should be practical demonstration of immediate action and transparent. 
He says he is undoubtedly Mumbai attack on the extremists to use Pakistani soil. 
In Peshawar during this officials said that coalition forces stationed in Afghanistan to take goods is one of the trucks and airport fire which has been imposed by Unknown armed men more than 50 trucks were destroyed. 
Peshawar in 48 hours during the Nato and this is the second attack on a US supplies. 
During the sins The defunct army raid on a suspected camp of mujahideen killed before and this is also an armed tribal areas by armed groups from Karachi in which have been many efforts to give compensation to back and no arms until assured to the action. 
Situation says General Zia ul Haq era in the American and Afghan intervention of former Soviet Union starting from Saudi funding the resistance in the wake of the end the armed groups to give birth as before in this environment for Pakistan's efforts to take back was not successful. 
question is what Pakistan wants to do so? 
What Pakistan is capable of spaces by it? 
What you are saying? 
Click here for details 
Grace notes comments that only due to the increasing number of letter in Urdu the opinions will be published. 
On board the online for the screenplay Alt shift will pressure Urdu.) 
My only one question is the of all humanity: 
If you his children, He he lost your companion route, It is impossible 
Saeed, Multan 
And My question to you that science studies with Islamic from east and west, say no logic, argued and philosophy change the American attack innocent people including devout, Labor and employment is murder of poor professional employees? 
And if not, you see his tip of the reform is urgently needed. 
People were armed this time it was feared that Russia should Afghanistan traveling to Pakistan after the bust so people were armed. 
Now when it is feared that the United States mounted on the way of Pakistan will run its present US president have been openly expressed in his presidential campaign, we, why people armed them? 
Only projects so that the United States and India after the Pakistani army under any kind of public have not to face of resistance? 
Yes, if any of those involved in a destructive operation, Pakistan should only action against it. 
But unfortunately it is the government army Mujahideen of the less India is given the right declared that Pakistan is involved in this. 
Najib Rehman Lahore [P KI $T N] 
be taken if it accepted that the battalion involved mujahideen then also blaming Pakistan government is not right. 
A question and it was also that these terrorists have any official or unofficial was not get the help of Indian officials? 
What terrorists are only prepared or bring in Pakistan and India and other countries in the world are not ready in? 
As far as host of mujahideen recent terrorism is concerned, no connection with it. 
This thing to remember is that Hafiz Saeed was' jihadi leader, who had before the Taliban of sedition, had declared. 
firm I believe that the Taliban uprising part of US plans is therefore man is necessary to remove from the road harassment any challenge with regard to Taliban. 
The entire nation of cooperation Despite Indian after coming under pressure to force the Action Against to the and and soap. referring to the spirit 
From Saudi America started to end the campaign for them to ask that harm from now to dirt who has filled the our society. 
Also protest with them that what the United States under ethical and Saudi dangerous weapons in our country and called hardline مگرحقیقتا'd hate literature and culture, which spread of virus to open the human slaughtered in our country. 
Danger of attack from India after the Pakistani army's announcement that the army from the Afghan border India will pay attention to the announcement of the Taliban and Afghan border that will take us seriously steadfast and her entire planted emphasized that India should not attack on Pakistan. 
American power in the region of this whole fear became public. 
Although India has not threatened attack, and not only his courage so. 
The Polish Taliban Attacks on US supplies the whole. 
proved that the Pakistan army and Pakistan Government nothing without the support of the United States. 
Karachi, Pakistan of business is all poor parts of Dubai Financial Center. 
Hundreds of thousands of empty handed never unsuccessfully from here, but when the supremacy of the law in western border areas from nonexistent has the attention of Karachi. 
Now they are bent of kidnapping of this city. 
First time is set to go to said, the people of the city is being as irrelevant, though one need fields. 
A solution to the problem, it is that, learn who speak Urdu and Pashto, or all the Urdu speaking or learn English, and good. 
You surely it a ridiculous proposal would understand but you does not ridiculous? because of the violence on 
Because of violence that language? 
Zaheer Chughtai 
Mr. this proposal in reality in which I told my friends to all religious and class people were given time achieve in childhood, on people laughed at her. 
At this time his language and the religious whose condition was not a quick and strong today was in bus in the pick. 
Do not understand that what it is and why? 
What are the same day and? 
Are innocent and are being killed innocent in what crime? 
reasons are front Pakistan to pieces, But only those who are active and they all are chanting nor is not and country. 
Karachi and Mumbai of the house caught fire is home. 
change the name of the government as "the only places The earning as there are, in the name of that airport, roads, blood sets Benazir. 
What this means the Karachi Benazir and is with the people of Pakistan? 
seemed The Mumbai attacks on the rise of raw tried to get to start sectarian riots in Karachi in the past, have failed to prove that it raw to work on the payroll of the political elements have now become resigns from the job. 
unjustly and blood of Indian workers who speak Pashto threats from Karachi rekindling Sui and core to the hospital. 
All political, religious, linguistic, and national parties, filled with love Pur equal reaction where India diplomatic etiquette taught there are US plan lawmakers also have provided a chance to think. 
Responsible for the bad situation in Karachi and BNP and administration is fast impartiality. 
administration can control the situation is in 1گھنٹہ but is John cargo to be given. 
police and due to the pressure of parties to refrain from action. 
Talking to the alliance only statements are limited, the political parties to abandon their interests and should work for the interests of the common man. 
When political pressure on the administration to such incidents will be taking will continue, God in Pakistan for their security. 
People in my opinion, the biggest terrorist. 
And no foreign forces in suspicious but not know who he is? 
But unfortunately this is that if any of these circumstances in the city, then the fate of the government there but when this government, if not in border seems helpless. 
Government should carry out operations here and a big and important city of the country terrorism would save. 
Otherwise Pakistan will have to face with a big financial crisis. 
BBC Urdu fear also killed was not writing the truth while condition, and also the Pakistani media puppet. 
Whole BBC English is on the Truth. 
A solution to the problem, it is that, learn who speak Urdu and Pashto, or all the Urdu speaking or learn English, and good. 
You surely it a ridiculous proposal would understand but you does not ridiculous? because of the violence on 
Because of violence that language? 
Another story of cruelty in Karachi was finally amount of which was felt quite every citizen in fear. 
Which drove the bus where it has no stone is 50 percent of this coming in the media which was here in four days. 
Last three nights in the wake and is still fear. 
hotel to vacate the and peanuts to those who kill. 
Super Highway to plunder and on the cutting of all are out of the agony of God who will never caught up to them. 
In your opinion, what are the reasons of this sabotage suddenly? 
(BBC) 
India to ten in the heart of the Mumbai killed in Karachi while keeping in mind to lack of due secure we pose no need of an but just simple and easy, is the reason that this lack of insensitivity manifests The 'blood' only was due to 
It's obvious that if 'father, it will no with' 'son, out of less, out of control of less will not be said. 
Blood, Many of Liaquat Ali Khan and also there was سایٔکو's wrong to remove be writing for the Sher 
We will also repeated old tradition of 
Made by John will, after John. 
Faizan portrayal Siddiqui 
Very is sad, the whole country is set at stake and we are diarrhoea each. 
Siddiqui stated that if Wikipedia. 
See in Org Liaquat Ali Khan, knows that you belong to a respectable Karnal area of Punjab province, to family. 
Because of his measures for migrants from the immigrants today his 
of reaction, It is. 
Can be tolerated, but for himself. 
Ejaz Awan 
Mr. before this night night also suggested that up to Jim to make sure, you collected tells endeavoured that real you open the harassment of tomorrow in Karachi today in the case of wall chalking and posters on walls are also getting. 
We both types of are coming. 
Though the villains, Pakistan and the founder of Pakistan should also not spared,, not had to face any reaction. 
With this as meager heart are the heart of Pakistan. 
A Muslim League; It was made also a draft amendment eighteenth handed over control of the People's Party. 
Prior to this, the MQM amendment and the Muslim League Q eighteenth collected in the draft of the National Assembly and Senate have staged. 
Yet, it seems that the eighteenth amendment is a political ploy and not sincere in any approved the amendment. 
This is the reason that so far the assembly in favor of the amendment on the floor of the Senate or not lamentation fuss and forced the parliament that he approved the amendment. 
Such feel eighteenth parties of depositing The draft amendments to the soil has been Bush tomorrow, to be able to say that we were depositing the amendment, the government had not only the proceedings, The speaker. 
MQM government coalition, the Muslim League disclosed The government ally and the Muslim League Q have the 17th amendment to the party, then how can it be sincere in parties to end the 17th amendment. 
The color is set to name in Martyrs blood. 
The People's Party, though not the end to the 17th amendment quickly. 
Any how good your hands can think of. 
Until president are not the end the 17th amendment. 
It was our majority in a survey of opinion and is also true. 
If must end the 17th amendment, then not become president. 
Now, They are even more powerful person with President Pervez because he is also the chairman of the People's Party With with the president. 
As long as he is president, 17th amendment. 
Political parties to end the 17th amendment to secure the first president to chaired the house will have to leave. 
It wants the MQM and nor other parties. 
Most of the old laborer belonging to our family was interested 
And when his uncle in childhood, maternal uncle and others to accusing see want it in heart, that God save us from the physical Labor compensation. 
To prevent this we wrote letter to the editor of the daily today and asked what to do after that we metric that we should not physical Labor. 
Editor, In response, wrote that Dr. or go bin and market catch low market subjects. 
Our trend from the beginning and we had the metric in technical instead of drawings read. 
But in S. C. FIA had forced Big Brother at the time of that we enter S. C. The IMF in medical doctor. 
We have barely a month, and when some placards read accounts had not changed it with the article. 
Physical Labor, we to fear has made many of his family and now we are in a good position on which we live every time giving thanks to God. 
It was remembered at this time when we talk with his two young sons carpets was trying to take the old home. 
still do not even half an hour was that young son 'deadline "It seems, not create secure this work." 
We have said so if this is true, then our like hearing low to read and physical Labor. 
Son replied, in Reading, I read and also will go but it is not on my work. 
Anyhow we like three did stop they work in three hours and return home. 
means it is to say that if the goal of taking the man behind it, whatever reason behind, none of this couldn't stop from receiving destination. 
Yes, if you know what is to not only that, then you are only God Hafiz. 
says that Murray, bad don't but we will have on the first anniversary of Benazir abuses are seen in them. 
Benazir freedom for the sake of its interests of Sikhs who fight the list of India provided the freedom movement of Sikhs to one, and on the other hand, India crushed the suppressed the movement of Punjab after providing a chance to concentrate in Kashmir. 
Nawaz Sharif's scene of power and is a part of history which has pushed the country years behind. 
Benazir during exile, Kashmir and negative statements to continue their nuclear program. 
Benazir Nawaz Sharif with the London with General Musharraf in violation of the agreement deal. 
Benazir in power, my husband and given the opportunity to openly money earner following Mr. with metal 
Benazir and his brother was killed in the era of which was sentenced to killer of children. 
Benazir of women's rights in spite of the woman to avoid fight. 
Benazir, which the body of his father, husband now like this on politics, his are politics on his body. 
Benazir Bhutto got the two times the government but he political murder of his father, to punish the criminals do not also registered a case against them. 
East Pakistan separately from US, There were 37 years of our people and the rulers Hussey not see extremists that any day mourning and not mourning on its mistakes. 
it should be that we celebrate on the day as a spree of December 16, and such measures and that it is not developing contingency again The accident. 
This day we humanism messages to the people of Bangladesh non governmental and his while trying to bring his close again. 
Ruling open to file and the Commission in a look on the reasons for the separation of East Pakistan. 
Trapped in Bangladesh, The plan to bring back the Beharis and encourage them to secure his non governmental gifts. 
But we have been helpless be die in our neighborhood WE are not Informed Of this. 
We thought of their brothers and sisters was not because we have been selfish. 
From big major tragedy we be passed next day then lost in their normal life. 
As East and West Germany could again be one were similarly, East and West Pakistan can also be one again. 
We can be one again if the two should sacrifice to secure a second and armor to come out. 
But the desire do not see in the near future. 
Today when Kin was said in the news that the US state governor of was arrested on corruption charges 
Provincial Congress to secure and remove from the governorship soon to prepare to scrutiny of this Edit one of which is, one of our American colleagues White was Pakistan, are keen on the situation we boast the that are known to see democracy. 
In the United States is not big man law, even from big altering 
And your country is also the president of Pakistan is after hold dropped corruption charges. 
Our vessel humor and we have said that if a governor was arrested in 156, what happened, our night night in Pakistan, arrested The prime minister once hanging was covered and second base in the country. 
Let ever happened in the United States? 
Pakistan, the country's law with guard the breakup of presidential indifferent to the House, let never happens in the United States? 
In Pakistan was suspended Chief Justice so that the public support Despite the still could not be restored, It happens in the United States? 
on fake degree holders in Pakistan was made, happened in the United States? 
After hearing the US poor with Hans was partially Hans and even lost their demands. 
In this picture President Zardari around the Americans are dark, despite being in smiled. 
It seems from his smile 
They understand that the United States is with his government are people but they forget that Pervez Musharraf were with one year ago. 
This picture, such has been like a family. 
Before this never in such snapshots newspapers publication a president with three U.S. officials. 
It seems the United States work in Pakistan has increased and now more than one operatives have to get to or on his new Ghulam not trust, which he was on the first. 
This is also president of breaking promises of Zardari, taking this have been made. 
If any sensible ruling, at least it's face and guiding his teeth in picture on slavery must be apparent embarrassment of 
If democracy should be implemented on this picture, President of principle Zardari are in the minority. 
Democracy According to the majority ruling the country and it is he who is the picture is speaking. 
Heaven Benazir Bhutto also called on Pakistan's Swat. 
Till now According to the government's strategy of force with dialogues are being taken. 
But of power and increasing power of people to create sympathy for them in anything except the is not. 
Power, it is imperative that the instead of the government to remove the reasons of 
Reasons grace and the end of the Taliban to himself will be removed. 
A BNP government on behalf of the per extent of bill would lead to solve the of Swat. 
But the Islamic law along with the government will also have to pay attention on the economic 
General Musharraf's started it was felt that perhaps this nation with the actions of Corner politicians will get rid of power but given the changed all of their intention 
Who were also hopes "Oh weekly inclusion in", he began to think in fact adopts its up 
And the steps which was expected end. 
As soon as Bush began The End of era of power, they themselves began the end of thought and in deal to the thieves. 
General Musharraf then can also control the army but the present government do not know that what is happening. 
Bajaur or not to control the army Swat and bombing is the "enemy" on the people, along with the loss of lives, property, mental patients given out, we not only an enemy 
Frontier province more than a year in the troubled area Swat time with worse than ugly situation, despite the continued military action are. 
One hand the government only approved resolutions in the National Assembly Resolution writ in the area has been reduced to a great extent to, and on the other hand, Taliban Influence OF Illegal RADIO FM Channel IN SWAT IS MUCH MORE. 
Third ordinary citizens in this thought to think that in this area, which is practically domination is this should be heard. 
During the security forces' operation in some Swat gunship helicopters and tanks bars the bombardment of the death of many extremists claims Taliban know, But despite these killings have taken not only more stable, but his administration, according to an estimate this percent on Swat was set up. 
The result that on one hand and not ready for the government acknowledge their failure to other Taliban stable. 
who, brotherhood between citizens. 
Swat now it is said that in response to any asked how people are the Taliban, got a very good because he is a defender of the religion and fighting against the enemies of God and religion, 
Then asked that the army is what got response, that very good because they are, the security of the country and against the enemies of the country, battering. 
Then asked that religion and who are enemies to the country, received a response we citizens. 
I am surprised how that Pakistani army with the Indian army fought with a small group of Taliban, which he could not control the. 
Taliban for illegally, the FM channel on track on could not, which I think is a very easy. 
But even then the FM all water and injuries with poison is showering. 
Children's schools. now After the school boys are being destroyed. 
Curfew is set up so easy to copy and Taliban can move. 
Today night curfew during the eight trucks Mingora penetrated in the countryside during the curfew given trenches. 
The question is how that despite the curfew There reached. 
Army Akbar Bugti, killed in the house is and Taliban 
God for any of the army that the Swat helpless people expelled from the grip of the Taliban and it should prove that the Pakistani army can be overwhelming on any enemy. 
Hazrat most in world are based on the writings of blood was spilt, you told me that if religion could not be evil blood, it can not be? 
Punjabi, Pathan, white and black, Mehsood and other tribes all these things are the production of religion? 
Never, not Mr. makes education, religion, it is that No No No refugee Punjabi otherwise no Kala historian if religion is not black himself and half of the world community in fighting the hostility of remaining confront human themselves. 
actually used religion to man the moral training here and this is bound to. he came not from their own but sent here by the creator Universe and this is According to the order here, is living. 
As a Muslim is sure I was a complete Hayat and true religion is Islam. 
Living in London to adopt the After years in every morning before his every relative know on though. Most have never taken no our news by phone once again I realized that we also to phone them not countryman we had left to phone. 
France from two years live in Wales in flashbacks, also What is felt. 
diet of telephone to us why people not only migration are optimistic. 
about Iraq in a few hours, 'for Darfur peace, not sending any problem. 
The Mumbai attacks immediately condemned and suspected organizations as Ban, few hours of work. 
Dance and where death is again about it. we are advice. 
Oh, here life and world peace is concluded. 
Should wait for the end of it, is not. 
So no oppressed catapult to get our right as a broader to use the mass destruction weapons could not even think of? 
When a father lost their quarter of also are running again raised a wave of pain and with heart in any part of not shine? 
If not, you not only entitled to the human 
But a black spot in the name of humanity. 
walk it proved that this area also is home to thousands of Israelis from the year. 
It ought to be that both nations continue to love and love each together, but their strings since the West and Arab countries are in the hands of this for them, without the wishes of peace can not be set up here. 
But now, Iran also wants to fight their proxy war here. 
Israeli action as temporary were also stop any will be started after the incident, then. 
BBC national interests of the United States and Israel are associated with hospitality, and this is the reason that 'modernism, Zionism in the pretext of' 'based on a series of has been stated and unilaterally and unlimited' is'. 
BBC just is doing' and just upheld The roundup its purpose and 
With should be published comment is that this votary become so that the idea that a little bit of facts and substance in the BBC is still remaining. 
Thank you. 
This story who did not know how came into existence but a written in every time is certainly are drinking the blood of more innocent people, 
Wars are used in every time and every time blood is flowing in. 
But it is surprising that the 21st century this man who is very civilized agree how their day silent on the murder and the public. 
How it does not feel that whatever is happening of humanity is presented as one of the worst. 
regrettable and tragic aspect is that the culture of the black man developed a century and the human aspect, the front will present a picture. 
Khair fools, Hyderabad Deccan 
This time in Dera Ghazi Khan along with the whole country are being the rains of winter. 
According to weather a poem of This poem is absent, with rain dementia. 
The rains also Are you 
The years, Bihar are 
The stay, have declared 
Never has come easily without reason 
Never. It was the night 
Never noise are never a silent 
The rains also Are you 
Someone in memory the night 
One was buried, to radical 
Sometimes it was that put off 
Never burned himself of himself. 
Never gradually are in grief, 
The rains also Are you 
All these ruling away by a heavy case, were teeth, country or injustice. 
People sold or lemon peel and temples of the ringing. 
As a rulers, our media is unlawful faster. 
aim is only government to raise money and nothing. 
As he was ignorant people, to talk about it this ignorance of 
Yesterday afternoon strange matter. 
All the biggest police be race here was not asked to parking on. 
NYPD and, and traffic was not in the mood that illegal Park cast an eye on vehicles. 
A plane of some U.S. airlines that was really became the plane and was "in the river. 
So far only so know that "terrorists" belonged to the generation of birds to goose. 
Perhaps historic cold of New York yesterday. 
It not so 
The walk out of my half an hour himself is having to jaw with pain. 
Around realizing that these people were jumping in the river of the plane will be what recently happened. 
Happiness is that all of the people were safe. 
plane of the thing is that the company and the drown in the crisis. 
It sees sees in West Side proposed Jersey from highway was closed and SEE ALSO that the South is still in what? 
G was involved in this rush in return. 
Thank my one hour during the spelling of, had opened the way that I was the exit of 56 street. 
In the first two exit, if not for this not to see the lines started on the. 
Buffet, My Pakistan: Mubarak you, Eid Mubarak. 
faith: Of course 
bloom: Mubarak, you, Eid Mubarak. 
Sarah: I have two made sacrifices Qurban and is like he has has given tell 
Besides this, no way. 
And on this form to the meat also have to make himself including skin pottery. 
in the net for repairing dot com may take time. 
Forum on what happened? 

Of Suno from two hands to see in 
Mubarak, you, Eid Mubarak. 
Sir crane used 
Snow will be disappeared. 
We Swati Talibani was civilized think in free who was only favored on education of women. 
This unhappiness to not gives every day of the demolished school and college women was expressed their. 
But also the way it often views opinion was not proved correct, CNN, According to the report, this today Monday blessing the independent day Talibani a school boys, demolished by explosives. 
Swat, a collapse of the Taliban school boys. 
Girls' school, famous in English saying "while working on the lawsuit first" demolished were made before, found people still not devoid from Taliban, civilized and culture animal to say why 
Talking to this one and it is also clear that Talabani started on the allegation that they are only against the education of girls, not right. 
But they are against the education, 
God mujahideen on Pakistan and power, AND Infernal Government 
Who is imposed on us, it's to help them in forgive. 
Amen Amen. 
So far one hundred eighty school have been demolished. 
Muslims Born in cemented, interested to talk before the survivors on the name property custom of marriage to the Quran, and many regarded the emphasis on the issue That Girl Aqil adults and be in eight years, is less the Frog in India, that had not been married the girl with the news. 
The toe see picture was on the occasion of marriage. 
This some time ago from a married the girl with dogs were also fresh. 
They also see toe. 
humanity in the 21st century is also scarce. 
intervention of today is the era of tomorrow and computer in every sector of life is increasing. 
Many people in the computer and many are on intervention, such as financial affairs. 
Where the use of credit cards to facilitate to you from there to the law enforcing agencies on the private life better grip. 
Like that only financial affairs to record the use of credit cards can be identified. 
And when to use real money in the future it will be extremely less benefits and will be increased. 
Similar crimes in the World Bank, credit card instead of taking the risk of looting blew THE Information ARE. 
Similarly, now have also become sources to friendship 
social network working web sites such as fees and sold Mai come in first status in popularity. 
But mentally, Do you not think that we as their social network under the works are at, so people are only. 
Similarly match remaking the web site, where you have got to like to other people like the list of people who keep fit you is showing. 
So what you just as soon as his life from a person can spending? 
I can not spend half the dedicated partner for this also known better. 
The flaws in me that they should they meet. 
I got little perhaps some part in 1993. 
Any big since childhood, which says the only true for me. 
This as believe had to know the answer every question of the world. 
Also my fun on this quickly. 
But only does he was really who was also possible. 
Many complications that false speaking of what was needed. 
In this age also raised loss from it. 
Therefore it is my effort at least lies. 
Any false Lara don't and he started with the name of Allah, The. 
And then say when I pray to God that job is finished. 
Rest of recently, only God knows better. 
It is a hideous issue which was created because of the distance from religion. 
According to the law of both Pakistan and having less children should be the mother. 
Is responsible and his father spent his father may have to children. 
Then adults when children, be that want to be, which possesses. 
You have correct that the real issue relatives who are taught bandage quality 
thinking on all our deeds dominates. 
Here is also working this philosophy that the father in the properties of the new section will be born, and this is opposed the otherwise his father's, is praiseworthy and this process. 
Relatives here these spasm of establishments have created social abuses 
widow and the concept of marriage is scarce. 
This waste of blasphemy and traditions which are being family system due to chaos. 
If a person 50 years in our society's wife of a wife or husband and be sent if tensions where they take second marriage, then why not seen a good view it? 
One Pakistani uncle, his wife near our ten or twelve had died a year ago after marriages now all children, He has married a woman widowed, children, have been taken against them. 
In my view, this is his constitutional right, what you are saying? 
Our any of our mother are to take place, It is not tolerate the thinking what kind of thinking? 
I think he's children should think that after all of the children to weddings if he has married a woman widowed, did wrong? 
This way the widowed woman was also found support and the uncle was also found a assuming no home 
because of their children their there would have been busy world Mega and time not deteriorate. 
Because the barbarousness. 
of tomorrow if they have refused to serve the old, then he 
This is the result of the pressure of the society. 
When people on this activity such fun of the family, children is being embarrassed on his father's second marriage 
Though they should face the situation should and say that the process of their father accordance of Islam. 
It is a curse in our society last 40 -50 years, we have been facing fully in. 
It is approved that a wife to Mian unlawful being but other does not married to keep. 
If in the bus to, even after his death. 
Mian, along with his doomsday also destroyed and leading cause of dissemination filth in the society. 
Islam strain of Islam nothing happens we like those which are our tradition. 
Example, Bani rehabilitation, education for girls keep bestowed by on marriage and the like. 
You are home to the widow question, Mr. big himself a widow, instead of bringing them go home, over the top somehow grumpy by experimenting and satisfied with the widow (Yes contraction in the stomach again 
In Pakistan and Indian subcontinent we have accepted centuries before Islam, but this thinking ignorantly today could not belonging to pursue and go to Islam only welcome with tradition. 
Bawdy Men's second marriage, divorce on coronation of defamation, developed divorcing woman's marriage to respect like untouchable, marks on his age of And the men of this woman married to a woman of understand the result of deceitfulness is only due to this philosophy. 
In a copy of, and Western nations and we are called old continent and invisible. 
Islam, it was easy to accept to depose pursue thinking very difficult. 
God we all the courage and Atta representation. 
Amen. 
Was so difficult, never write Urdu. 
harmonious Beit writes like writes. 
matter a lot. 
May Allah protect. 
Rich Timor in his book "I write in Timor" that is his life in this secret found that if any of the army commander in chief, the army will be in line first would failed. 
But on the other hand, are conditions and 
This say people are dying for US, we for martyred 
Murray, of the people killed 
Assalamu Alaikum 
Today night after Isha prayers shop in a man in a car organs attract the hands. 
In the this man way been forgotten stop in his entire family was sitting in the vehicle. 
He depends in Arabic in the unseen understand that not good you said that is not a problem 
He depends in Riyadh from in Medina here but it took off my pocket you please forgive any should help In said that "my brother, because one, with the first that in Banda riyals surveillance with that full petrol go away, but it bit work has begun. 
I felt great anger has threatened to silent 
Nawab this condition has been demanding the Muslims we are treated with family also vehicles for the noble least pillager stakes. 
While it (hadith upon Allah defendant Muhammed) under the hand from the under demanding to 
Almighty Allah we will made (Amen Amen) 


The renowned singer Adnan Sami on his wife accused of violence, reached a Mumbai police station 
police station, gave him instructions to appeal to the court. 
Adnan Sami's wife, appeal against her husband, the continuous violence that Adnan Sami on them. 
And human behavior are right, 
Now it out by their bear is therefore be registered a case against the Adnan Sami 
saying instead of police have registered a case to these instructions to appeal to the court that the lottery diarrhoea police is not the issue. 
In your opinion, Adnan Sami on his wife's allegations are correct? 
This allegation Adnan Sami anywhere, not try to spoil the Indian? 
about his opinion in this regard. 
Mehr, the city 
As far as the allegations is concerned, any other human define can get is 
honor is not anything more than 
The present wife and Adnan Sami belong There are some of my honor Adnan Sami life was money earner after leaving India, is now embraced the same fame psychologist 
This is the consequence of his actions 
Washington... 
Senior American officials said that President Afghan President Hamid Karzai will adopt strict stand in about 
About Afghanistan, instead of development in the new US strategy in has been more importance to the war. 
Authorities say that Hamid Zai for American targets in Afghanistan is being considered as obstacle in getting the drugs because there is corruption in government, business has increased and the strength of the Taliban again is being collected. 
American officials said that the US administration is to the people more for some of the pressure on the Hamid Karzai put his vice president who are and representatives of Afghanistan and Pakistan's president about Richard Hall. 
He said that this strategy is to come to the fore after President Bush, who with every two weeks Zai Hamid after a video conference and he was on Afghanistan and the American role in the reconstruction of civilian institutions on stressed. 
Authorities say that administration of the central government, will work with the provincial leaders. 
Authorities say that they Zai Hamid stressed the war against corruption more to offer. 
Hamid Karzai is facing a new elections this year and it is still not clear that and his companion for the chairmanship will support them or not. 
This statement of the American officials with regard to Afghanistan's indication of a change in American policy, not? 
What is the end of Hamid Karzai? 
In your opinion what about this? 
Between Pakistan and Sri three one day matches against Sri Lanka in the series of 1 6-2 defeat to Pakistan. 
One day before the match in Pakistan a crushing defeat to Sri Lanka, However the next two Sri Lanka won the election. 
third one day national cricket team's performance in the match was very poor, Sri Lanka's national team only in response to the 309رنز 23 overs مین75 runs to and thus he faced lesson nose of defeat. 
series with the result it is proved that the national cricket is not ended in the performance of the team. 
Home ground and Despite all the claims the national team facing defeat, in your opinion, what are the reasons of this? 
Authorities is necessary to pay more attention on the decisive areas of? 
Are you satisfied with the selection of the team? 
You defeated the responsibility of what will control department, fielding, batting or bowling? 
about his opinion. 
Babar Hussain, Jeddah, a lot is sad that today's modern man, this kind of ignorantly goes on cultures are Villa, farmer from its sovereignty savagely landowners are targeting innocent people who will ask them? 
Never any Sardar you trench going on, Why does not government action against them? 
Judicial justice came when work 
Sri Lankan cricket team play the one day international series has reached Pakistan 
Any foreigner, despite the tension between Pakistan and India cricket team's arrival is welcome. 
The Sri Lanka team at the Karachi airport was warmly received. 
One day two match between Pakistan and Sri Lanka, while the third one day will be in Lahore, Karachi 
Of both teams about bowling batting and fielding by big tall claims are being made. 
Sri Lanka spinners on his affection for those who is faith in the Pakistan fast bowling. 
Sri Lanka's captain Chandana says that the Pakistan team is one of the players is not dangerous, the whole team. 
Muralitharan and trump card will be while Pakistan captain said that the competition will be very strict. 
Shoaib Malik has said that played to Muralitharan, will also take we have prepared a secret game plan, showing its will, in the field. 
What really Pak Sri Lanka will be interesting and according to the sensational claims? 
Pakistan and Sri Lanka in the series between the fringe of how heavy will be? 
Who will win the series? 
Who will be the Man of the Series? 
about his opinion. 
London, statement of his choice, you also are giving the priority to our wish is that the writing something you really like Mukherjee will not bend unshackled cranes In the statement because brutal Hakim and it is ordered to say right ahead of jihad Mukherjee is similar to what the statement said of change are trying to keep in the news 
Yusuf, Dubai. 
This is what all of those people laid Kashmiri last 60 years are fighting a war of independence from the 
No body has not asked now the man caught the war extremism and terrorism have started cleaning the compromise, things are contained 
First murder of Muslims are common in the cycle of resolve issues now 
However, Pakistan will have to understand their dual policy, 
Khan, London 
India is create this kind of situation that the world attention should be removed from Kashmir 
But Pakistan has always face of reality of India is of the world 
Now British government also understand this is the same for Name maligned Pakistan with the Indian terrorism from Kashmir eyes are stealing 
While talking on this issue with Pakistan and are investing 
British Foreign Minister David received band has said that resolving the Kashmir issue will be end extremism from taking the rise on the Pakistan border, government will be able to deal with the effective way dangers. 
It should be noted that prior to this newly elected US president also has expressed the views of like this on the Kashmir issue. 
British Foreign Minister, Speaking to media in Mumbai in interaction article wrote that the war against terrorism is a wrong idea of making himself justify the dangers faced by President Bush's policy was to kill the people. 
David received band has said that Pakistan is for extremist groups will not show any leniency. 
Of major powers stressed the need to resolve the Kashmir dispute to India due to the tension in the region this issue is not, try to divert attention from? 
Terrorism in Mumbai, not part of this strategy? 
What India to making terrorism wants to escape from the process of composite dialogue is? 
about his opinion. 
Aftab. 
In my opinion, the big powers are not in the mood to provide complete loss to Pakistan 
But some steps to keep under control are thinking of them know that Pakistan is a nuclear power. 
Here want to have the case of a revolution 
Foreign countries that are thinking to Pakistan to corner geographical, Political can be some difficulties are also want to help Pakistan and its goals are also want to meet 
unwittingly city, USA. 
Beside Hindu always is a tradition that define the mouth knife in Ram 
I think that the bus is a little pain in the stomach comes from a little and they are seem to threats to Pakistan 
We are prepared every sort of India, chief of the army closed their mouth broke its otherwise we face are know to answer 
Siddiqui. 
Cape America is being raised and statement from the mind of, India is only bad but now it also has recently seen by attack, would become reality know who is in how much water 
Is Hamas attack on Israel, but in any shame that brochures. India also saw Israel saw India is also wants to it 
Prime Minister Syed Yusuf Geelani has said that the US Former President Musharraf's newly elected vice president, uniform and restored democracy Like has played an important role in, they have to the government of Pakistan has star recipient of discrimination. 
uniform and the restoration of democracy in credit should not go to any political party, parliament, rubber stamp is not, 
All decisions will be taken in parliament. 
The Prime Minister said that Dr. Qadeer's Bob has been closed. 
You think exerted no importance of public protest against 
The lawyers movement did not play any role? 
The prime minister's statement on what you want to say. 
about his opinion. 
US President George W. Bush in his farewell press conference to advise newly elected President Barak presided over his post, said that he has a lot of mistakes and Barak in who he started well, 
In As the president According to the situation and taken steps under the constitution and law, The American interests given priority on his popularity 
Today, He said the enemies of America are also planning to attack on America, Barak for the biggest challenge will be to stop these attacks, 
He said that the large scale from Iraq for not get Weapons of mass destruction on my biggest disappointment and admitted to complete the mission in Iraq is my biggest mistake. 
Addressing his last press conference at the White House, The US president said that this is my last press conference and participated in the conference of journalists and other friends I thank those who participate in it. 
Do you think that he will not repeated mistakes which Bush has? 
have no delay in an acknowledgment of mistakes? 
Acting on the advice of Bush will win? 
about his opinion. 
In Vice President Dick Cheney has said that I want to see Osama Bin Laden dead or alive. 
He says that Osama Bin Laden is a difficult area and he was hidden in his organization has been ineffective, for if Osama Bin Laden dead or alive also arrested, of this will be to this organization. 
America is determined on to arrest Osama and continue the search for Osama should mortgage. 
To arrest Osama fulfill their desire of Dick Cheney would be? 
about his opinion. 
All rounder Shahid Afridi cricketer PIA in Azam trophy and Habib Bank after the end of the first day of the match of their clash with a spectators. 
UBL Shahid Afridi on ground after the match play as drawings when he came out of the room has collected around them, a large number of fans 
On one occasion a spectators and holding hands with his picture on the application of Shahid Afridi said while goals to take this picture tomorrow, But the spectators on the insistence of Afridi has to take slap her receipt in effect prior to that they each got there are people issue wear times. 
After this, Shahid Afridi said that the issue is being made at this time I was quickly, the prayer 
However, will I regret this spectators in 
Shahid Afridi, What will you say you on this attitude. 
we Should INFORM HIS Opinion. 
Indian Prime Minister Manmohan Singh has alleged that Pakistan is once again is environment of war. 
And Pakistan as state terrorism policy, is used. 
In New Delhi chief ministers Manmohan Singh said while addressing the conference that was terror are backing from neighboring countries, especially Pakistan 
The naval terrorists and the Mumbai attacks carried out and Indian coast guard are safe from the river. 
The Indian prime minister said that the army attack in Mumbai in November The Mujahideen. 
He further said that terrorists are using new techniques and modern telecommunications system, we will be extended to strictly on the Line of Control, There is infiltration from where they had said that terrorism will not be tolerated under any circumstances, and this is our policy. 
The Indian prime minister's allegation how you see? 
کیابھہرت's internal struggles like Indian anxiety of Mazhar 
India on the desires of what is the threatening attitude? 
about his opinion. 
Khan, Karachi. 
This is a very bitter tragedy that Israeli murder of Palestinians are common Kashmir, as this situation is, But as the head of council not to 
As there are organizations in Palestine and Kashmir which they should in that war and continue until his freedom created while not every type of aggression continue to face a one day he will bring evidence of color 
Israeli air attack on Gaza remains are still going on till now, hundreds of Palestinian men, women and children have been martyred. 
Hamas the important political wife has been martyred including children. 
On the other hand, the Security Council's meeting ended without any decision. 
Meeting in Libya and other Arab countries against Israel resolutions submitted by the resolution to face US opposition. 
Palestinian civilians many population continued bombardment of Israeli planes. 
Incidents in Mumbai, the entire world was shouting settles But Israeli attacks on America, Britain, do not see any massacred to including? 
Why the important countries of the Muslim community are silent? 
On this double standards in the world you would want to say. 
New York. 
In my opinion, The reality is that most of our nation is read they know where their money is not only to fulfill his responsibilities by setting up a government tax has interest in the electricity and gas crisis will remain so. 
Because the people who have elected them most are aware of the role, 
Pakistan and breadth of the electricity and gas crisis in shape is 1.5 
On the other hand from January 1st اوسطاً8اضافہ in gas prices has been in some cities of the country while non availability of petrol is a worry for people. 
Pakistan long closure of the industrial and business circles in electricity and gas on the crisis of severe reaction, violence on expanding and demonstrations are still going on, 
Industrialists has ordered to close factories ultimatum. 
In Karachi, eight to 10 hours of Load shedding from citizens in unrest is found. 
Industrial life is now almost be disturbed. 
Government institutions in this regard each other on charges are statement after having their stand. 
electricity and gas prices of the talks with the nation is not fun? 
Why attention towards the solution of problems is not being given? 
Development of government do not see a wheel jam? 
To overcome this crisis will you what steps immediately proposal? 
about his opinion. 
in Madina, I want to say that people like though the ruling. 
surprised me is that the slogan of civilian government is suffering the people to B 
get mixed not petrol to gas has become a punishment 
As the government institutions is no control 
On the law and order situation to legislate on this country is Allah mercy as their patience 
of the New Year. 
Last year riots and a year of political biography and type was also in the context of terrorism, it will be remembered. 
Power of President Musharraf and President Bush's eight years of separation from rain and shoes at the end, Bush, natural calamity, to establish a democratic government in Pakistan earthquake in Baluchistan, financial crisis In all over the world, marketing. 
Now is the arrival of the new year, The year you see how to? 
You near the political or geographical situation will bring color what would be the strategy? 
The hope of any progress in the eradication of terrorism is? 
In Pakistan, the judicial crisis will come to an end? 
Relations between Pakistan and India would face right? 
surgical or Full is the possibility of war? 
You are linked to the expectations by New Year? 
about his opinion. 
Benazir Bhutto is being celebrated the first anniversary of the martyred, they 27دسمبر2007ء after an election meeting in the Liaqat hijacked martyred. 
Benazir Bhutto today we are not in serious, politics, jurists and personality were capable of world fame, was his unique role in national politics. 
A period of one year despite the passage of the death of puzzle until today is not resolved. 
In the establishment of democracy in Pakistan and the government were not fruitless effort of his opinion. 
Today is a democratic government in Pakistan and her husband Asif Zardari occupy as president of the country. 
Benazir Bhutto martyred in the politics of Pakistan's role you see how? 
He is behind the evidence of how can the hand of? 
them recently also was the recipient of international human rights award, exerted about his political and democratic services you would want to say. 
President بش8 years America be indifferent to the white after the government on the presidential camp office Camp David were transferred so that the new president to White House Barak renovated and according to the wishes of decoration and be ready, 
away with the eight years of the Bush presidency in America in historical attack on the World Trade Center and destruction, Mantua and then in the international war against terrorism in Afghanistan and Iraq under the pretext of military action while the forces of various countries roles in the war and the US full use of resources in Bush's era became a memorable examples. 
This war to America from history faced the worst economic and financial crisis. 
What do you think of this war in the world rower and found? 
What President Bush's policies continue to succeed? 
During President Bush's government of on your view? 
Indian Government visited the Indian cricket team is allowed by Pakistan. 
Indian cricket team to tour Pakistan for three Tests, five one day matches and play a 20 matches. 
Indian cricket board vice president Rajiv Shukla said while talking to GEO News that the board had called allowed the Pakistan tour from the government but due to the present tense situation between the two countries can not visit it. 
Making the Indian Government justify the present political situation cricket team's tour is a correct step, to cancel the game should not have separate from politics? 
Not harmful for Indian cricket with the decision of the government? 
the bad security situation in India continue cricket team visited the Indian team, Why can not visit Pakistan? 
In your opinion what is about this. 
Karachi. 
People who are proud to visit India 
And video films or the There are now be opened his eyes that how you respect the people of India. 
I can remember an interview of Adnan Sami in which he had said that is not my British citizenship in Pakistan 
Adnan Sami must come first in engagements that Pakistan because thee to respect was not sign there, 
Ahmad. 
Karachi. 
Mumbai Indians attitude was changed after the attack. 
Reaction, Singh in this case that they hate Pakistan and Pakistani are 
know the that Adnan Sami cow with the songs are now in Sada, Adnan Sami has from where he should come here to be in India does not need The 
Shamshad, world 
Karachi, would only say on Singh's statement that he is also like color minds 
Pakistanis who are flying statement surrounding the site in India that your eyes So how is the "mentality. 
Hate calls after the incident, The statement in Mumbai, flying increased is now only famous poison against Sami are showering. 
According to foreign news agency, Iraq's Prime Minister, US President Bush came on a farewell tour with Noor al-maleki located in Baghdad during the press conference in his office was ridiculous situation at this time when an Iraqi journalist, addressed to President Bush, said "the dogs a farewell kiss". 
The journalist after their one shoe picked thrown by Bush, President Bush has expertise from shoe already due to their head kneel and rescued to you. 
Second shoe was to an American flag. 
Security personnel, this journalist from the place. 
On this occasion, President Bush said that I do not know why did this, was جوتا10نمبر, I did not face any problem. 
In your opinion, this process of to the Iraqi people had not expressed their anger against the president Bush? 
What will you say you on this incident? 
Incidents of terrorism in the Mumbai Born in the relations between Pakistan and India after the tension increased ahead adopt serious situation at this time when the Indian Air Force fighter planes of Lahore in Pakistan and Kashmir sectors of violation of the air limits. 
Pakistan Air due to counter action of the Indian plane were forced to go back. 
According to the sources, both Indian plane were armed with weapons and ammunition. 
In the present tense situation is the first incident of its kind. 
Pakistan Air Force has said that air is fully prepared to defend the country. 
Information MInister Shiri Rehman said that Indian Officials Have Acknowledged that Violation of air Limits, However It happened BY Mistake. 
Pakistan's military sources, this incident as serious. 
In your opinion, what really has intention to attack on Pakistan Air India? 
What India's stand is correct that this violation to a mistake or the purpose of realize the potential of the Pakistan Air 
This incident further increase in tension between the two countries would not lead to? 
about his opinion. 
Benazir martyred after arrest was given death of international human rights award which his son, and Chairman of the People's Party Bhutto and Zardari did receive. 
Office of the United Nations General Assembly in in a ceremony during a meeting of Pakistan's former Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto, شہیدبے's confession of their services for human rights in this award was Nawaz. 
The human rights resolution from the United Nations 60th birthday was celebrated on December 10. 
On this occasion to work for human rights in recognition of personalities and institutions which are being given to the honors them in addition to Benazir Bhutto, former US Attorney General Luis Clark and throughout the world to work for human rights in the international organization Human Rights Watch. 
This occasion Pakistan's ambassador at the United Abdullah Hussein Haroon and other Pakistani senior diplomatic officials were also present. 
Former Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto martyred on receiving this award what you will say. 

Chicago. 
It is true that he was but we should remember that he has many Spilt blood of innocent people in Karachi, on which they were. that Naseer Allah Baber has done a very good job, 
after I 20 
But it is also true that he has his party's senior people to set style and his son to elected representative of the People's Party, This is what democracy,? 
Noor, Karachi, this news of Quran It has been proved that with the non non of the will. 
But as long as the iron grave group can not do not cut on feel axe 
way is the same thing our rulers are their secret way due to this country as unpleasantly are coming. 
God give instructions to our rulers. 
The panel of the United Nations Security Council Hafiz Mohammed Saeed JuD and three Pakistani citizens including five organizations, including name are included in the list of terrorists. 
Security Council of Al Qaeda and Taliban terrorists the name of the Pakistanis, who committee has approved to be included in the list of his Dawa party Mohammad Saeed, banned organization in army operations chief Zaki Rehman mujahideen, Haji Mohammad Ashraf, head of the finance department. 
apart from this, a Saudi citizen of name also is included in the list of terrorists. 
These organizations, Pasban JuD in Kashmir, al-Rashid Trust International trust. 
Member countries immediately legend of figures and organizations will freeze all assets and will respond travel ban and they will be arrested. 
They will face of cases. 
What these restrictions, not under the control of the Indian propaganda impact? 
India accused of Mumbai attacks without any evidence why is imposed on these organizations? 
terrorist organizations present in India do not? 
What to atrocities on minorities in India, not aware international institutions? 
we Should INFORM HIS Opinion. 
A spokesman of the Eid and and unity Azha follow the Sunna Brahimi on animals while sacrifice. 
The political uproar in far When Inflation On the Rise On the Actual Situation, THIS Eid and Poor, ALL according to their Owners, AND THE preparation OF his friends in Different WAYS WISHES FOR Eid. 
We also are providing a chance you through that their loved ones in the form of short messages to congratulate the Eid. 
You Eid through keeping verses from the can also congratulated. 
Jilani, 
Karachi, this was our rulers should understand that they are operation against the same appreciative of Pakistan who are all kinds of oppression suffered But a love for Pakistan. 
If war, would fight alongside the Pakistan. 
When they feel the love, will be only protest will not be anything from politics, I think man between the two, decisive war is likely to be out so that 
